From arielle@taronga.com Mon Jul 27 13:48:54 1992
From: arielle@taronga.com (Stephanie da Silva)
Newsgroups: news.lists,news.announce.newusers,news.answers
Subject: Publicly Accessible Mailing Lists, Part I
Summary: 364 mailing lists in three postings
Date: 18 Jul 92 17:50:34 GMT
Followup-To: poster
Organization: Taronga Park BBS
Supersedes: <KILGIEK@taronga.com>

Archive-name: mailing-lists/part1
Original-author: chuq@apple.COM (Chuq Von Ruspach)
Last-change: 18 July 92 by arielle@taronga.com (Stephanie da Silva)

[This is the first of three articles on mailing lists.]

Quick Summary of Changes
------------------------
  Added since last list:
    Amazons International   AR-News                 AR-Talk                 
    Aviator                 bugs-386bsd             Counterev-L             
    Decision Power          dire-straits            Epoch Users Forum       
    info-honda              isdn                    navnews                 
    SDAnet                  SFRaves                 Star Fleet Battles      
    toad                    toyota                  uk-hockey               
    YSN

  Deleted since last list:
    ecuador                 honda

  Changed since last list:
    flamingo                framers                 Progress
    Talon-Eclipse-Laser     vampire                 Z-cars


Intro
-----
This is a list of mailing lists available primarily through the
Internet and the UUCP network. A mailing list is different from a
newsgroup because you do not receive anything unless you specifically
request it. To be added to a mailing list, please mail a note to the
contact for that list, listed below.

The list does not include any of the many hundreds of lists that are
available through various Bitnet ListServ sites.  

Some of the lists mentioned may be available as limited-distribution
newsgroups.  Contact the administrator for exact details.

Please note the following caveats: publication of a list here does not
guarantee that you will be allowed to join as a member.  That is up to
the moderator and readers, and they have the right to restrict access
to their list as they see fit. Mailing lists use MUCH less system
overhead on a world-wide basis but do tend to increase loading on the
moderators' machines so the number of people that can be added to a list
may be limited by machine resources as well.

In your request to join a list, please include a signature or some
other copy of your mailing address. DO NOT RELY on your "From:" mail
header arriving unmangled or even vaguely representing what you think
your prefered address is.

Steven Bjork at the Network Information Systems Center maintains a
list of mailing lists that exist primarily on the Internet.  That list
overlaps this one in a few places, but the lists are largely distinct.
A copy of that list may be obtained by anonymous ftp from the site
ftp.nisc.sri.com (192.33.33.22) in the file "netinfo/interest-groups".
To add or delete an entry to that list, mail to
interest-groups-request@nisc.sri.com.

If you have a list that you want added to this posting or are interested in
starting a list but don't know how, drop me a note at spaf@purdue.edu


		    Groups listed in this posting

    12step                  30something             386users
    3d                      ABC                     act-up
    adoption                aeronautics             agenda-users
    aids                    AIDS-stat               algeria-net
    alife                   Alspa                   alternates
    Amazons International   anneal                  apc-open                
    argentina               artist-users            AR-News                 
    AR-Talk                 att-pc+                 autox                   
    Aviator                 backstreets             bagpipe                 
    bahai-faith             balloon                 ballroom                
    bbones                  bears                   BETA                    
    Between-the-lines       big-DB                  biosym                  
    blackbird               BMW                     brasil                  
    brass                   bread                   british-cars            
    bugs-386bsd             bx-talk                 C-IBM-370               
    ca-firearms             cabot                   camelot                 
    Cards                   Catholic                Catholic-action         
    cavers                  cdforum                 chalkhills              
    chem-eng                chem-talk               chessnews               
    christian               cisco                   clu                     
    CoCo                    comix                   commune                 
    compress                Counterev-L             Croatian-News
    Cro-News/SCYU-Digest    cryonics                Cthulu                  
    ctree                   CUSSNET                 cyberpunkRPG            
    CZ                      dark-shadows            datsun-roadsters        
    dead-runners            Decision Power          decstation-managers     
    derby                   DGRD                    dire-straits            
    dirt-users              disney-afternoon        Donosy                  
    DragonQuest             drwho-spoilers          DSA-LGB                 
    Dual-personalities      DVI-List                eastender               
    echoes                  ECTL                    edge                    
    elements                empire-list             emtex-user              
    Episcopal               Epoch Users Forum       esperanto               
    ethology                euro-moto               exotic-cars             
    Extropians              f-body                  f-mac                   
    femail                  feminism-digest         ferrets                 
    Fiction-Writers         filmmakers              firearms                
    flamingo                flashlife               Flat-Fields             
    folk-dancing            FoxPro                  framers                 
    fsuucp                  funky-music             glove-list              
    godlygraphics           gnu-manual              GRASS                   
    gug-sysadmins           Gunk'l'dunk             GURPS                   
    handicap                hang-gliding            Harleys                 
    health-ed               hey-joe                 homebrew                
    home-ed                 horse                   hotrod                  
    huskers                 hypeami                 hyperbole               
    IBDlist                 iclinfo                 IDOL                    
    il-info                 immune                  impulse                 
    info-aids               info-altos              info-ccc                
    info-encore             info-fortune            info-futures            
    info-gnu                info-high-audio         info-honda              
    info-ingres             info-prime              info-solbourne          
    info-stratus            info-tahoe              info-vm                 
    info-vw                 informix-list           interest-groups         
    Int'l Trade & Commerce  InterText               ipsc-managers           
    irchat                  isdn                    italian-cars            
    iti151                  jewish                  jump-in-the-river       
    khoros                  killifish               kites                   
    Kuharske Bukve          lang-lucid              lasnet                  
    lds                     liberal-judaism         libernet                
    LickVista               Linda                   Linux-Activists         
    Llajta                  Logo                    lojban                  
    lute                    MachTen                 macgyver                
    mac-security            magic                   manchester              
    martial-arts            Masonic Digest          MasPar                  
    Matlab                  mazda-list              MC68HC11                
    medphys                 Melissa Etheridge       men                     
    miata                   military                miniatures              
    mr2-interest            MST3K                   mtxinu-users            
    MUD                     Music-Research          musicals                
    mustangs                mystery                 NA-Net                  
    NativeNet               navnews                 Ncube                   
    netblazer-users         Network-audio-bits      neuron                  
    newlists                NewsCom                 nordic-skiing           
    nqthm-users             ntp                     nucmed                  
    numeric-interest        nwu-sports              objc                    
    objectivism             objectivism-philosophy  ODA                     
    offroad                 Oglasna Deska           oh-motss                
    on-this-day             on-u                    operlist                
    oracle                  orienteering            origami                 
    pagan                   Papa                    pc532                   
    pcgeos-list             pdp8-lovers             People of the South Wind
    Peru                    pharm                   physics                 
    picasso-users           pipes                   Pisma Bralcev           
    POP                     porschephiles           posix-ada               
    posix-testing           prion                   PRL                     
    Prog-Pubs               Progress                pubnet                  
    qn                      Quanta                  quattro                 
    Queen                   race                    recipes                 
    recovery                REM                     RokPress                
    RoleMaster              rune-quest              rush                    
    S-news                  sappho                  sca                     
    scoann                  scogen                  scoodt                  
    scribe                  SDAnet                  Secular Humanist Group  
    security                SFER-l                  SFRaves                 
    SkillsBank              smail3-users            smail3-wizards          
    smiths-fans             sonify                  sports-cards            
    SQL-sybase              stagecraft              stardent-users          
    Star Fleet Battles      stormbringer            stormcock               
    sun-386i                sun-managers            sun-nets                
    supercomputers          svr4-admin              sysops                  
    t3                      tadream                 Talon-Eclipse-Laser     
    tandy4k                 tartan-c                tcad                    
    tcp-group               tekumel                 Testing-Archive         
    Testing-Research        theatre                 thicva                  
    think-c                 thunderbird             tinymush-programmers    
    toad                    toaster-list            TolkLang                
    torg                    towers                  toyota                  
    transputer              traveller               tx-firearms             
    uk-hockey               uk-motss                ultralite-list          
    Unisys                  UPS-alumni              uruguay                 
    usml                    UUG-dist                vampire                 
    vanguard                venezuela               vettes                  
    VMEbus                  volvo                   Vreme News Digest       
    wais-discussion         wais-talk               walkers-in-darkness     
    wargames                warhammer               weights                 
    whitewater              wildnet                 windsurfing             
    Word-Mac                wxsat                   x-ada                   
    XGKS                    xopen-testing           XVT                     
    yello                   Yes/ABWH                Yiddish                 
    YSN                     Z-cars                  zeppelin                
    ZForum


		    Specific Information on Groups

12step
    Contact: suhre@trwrb.dsd.trw.com  (Maurice Suhre)

    Purpose: To discuss/share experiences about 12 step programs
    such as Alcoholics Anonymous, Overeaters Anonymous, Alanon,
    ACA, etc.  Questions will also be answered.  Please include a
    phone number in case of trouble establishing an e-mail path.

30something
    Contact: 30something-request@fuggles.acc.virginia.edu (Marc Rouleau)

    Purpose:  Discussion of the TV show by the same name, including
    actors, episodes, plots, characters, etc.

386users
    Contact: 386users-request@udel.edu (William Davidsen, Jr.)

    Purpose:  Topics are 80386 based computers, and all hardware and
    software which is either 386-specific or which has special interest
    on the 386.

3d
    Contact: 3d-request@bfmny0.bfm.com (Tom Neff)

    Purpose: Discussion of 3-D (stereo) photography. General info,
    hints, experiences, equipment, techniques, and stereo
    "happenings."  Anyone interested is welcome to join.

ABC
    Contact: abc-list-request@cwi.nl (Steven Pemberton)

    Purpose: Discussion of the ABC Programming Language and its
    implementations. Information on ABC is available in "The ABC
    Programmer's Handbook", Leo Geurts et.al, Prentice Hall 1990; "An
    Alternative Simple Language and Environment for PCs", Steven
    Pemberton, IEEE Software, Vol. 4, No. 1, January 1987, pp. 56-64.;
    by ftp from mcsun.eu.net, file
    programming/languages/abc/abc.intro; and by mail-server from
    info-server@hp4nl.nluug.nl: send two-line message: "request
    programming/languages/abc" "topic abc.intro".

act-up
    Contact: act-up-request@world.std.com (Lenard Diggins)

    Purpose: act-up was set up for the discussion of the work being
    done by the various act-up chapters worldwide, to announce events,
    to exchange ideas related to aids activism, and, more broadly, to
    discuss the politics of AIDS and health care.

adoption
    Contact: adoption-request@think.com

    Purpose: The list's charter to is to discuss anything and
    everything connected with adoption

aeronautics
    Contact: aeronautics-request@rascal.ics.utexas.edu

    Purpose: The "aeronautics" mailing list will be a moderated
    version of the sci.aeronautics newsgroup, and as such will deal
    with various technical aspects of aviation, such as human factors,
    airliner operations, avionics, and aerodynamics.  It will be a
    one-way feed (sci.aeronautics -> mailing list), unless sufficient
    demand requires that it go in the opposite direction.

agenda-users
    Contact: agenda-users@newcastle.ac.uk

    Purpose: A new mailing list for users of the Microwriter Agenda
    handheld computer.

aids
    Contact: aids-request@cs.ucla.edu (Daniel R. Greening)

    Purpose: A distribution list for people who can't read
    sci.med.aids.  Covers predominately medical issues of AIDS.  Some
    discussion of political and social issues.  Postings to AIDSNEWS
    and Health InfoCom News mailing lists are also carried.

    Unlike info-aids, postings to aids@cs.ucla.edu are
    NON-confidential.  The average number of postings to aids is about
    2 per day.  The average size of articles is very large
    (statistics, news summaries, etc.)  sci.med.aids and
    aids@cs.ucla.edu are moderated. (see also "info-aids" mailing
    list)

AIDS-stat
    Contact: aids-stat-request@wubios.wustl.edu (David Dodell)

    Purpose: AIDS-STAT is a moderated mailing list whose sole purpose
    is for the distribution of AIDS statistics from various agencies.
    The prime information being distributed will be the Center for
    Disease Control's monthly AIDS Surveillance Report.

algeria-net
    Contact: belk@pyr.gatech.edu  (Nasr Belkheir)

    Purpose:  a forum for discussion about political, cultural aspects
    of Algerian society.

alife
    Contact: alife-request@cognet.ucla.edu
 
    Purpose: The alife mailing list is for communications regarding
    artificial life, a formative interdisciplinary field involving
    computer science, the natural sciences, mathematics, medicine and
    others.  The recent book _Artificial Life_, Christopher Langton, ed.,
    Addison Wesley, 1989 introduces the scope of artificial life as a field
    of study.  Alife was chartered in February 1990 at the Second Artificial
    Life Workshop, held in Santa Fe & organized by the Center for Nonlinear
    Studies at the Los Alamos National Laboratory and the Santa Fe
    Institute.  The list is intended primarily for low-volume, high-content
    scientific correspondence and as a publically accessible forum for the
    interested members of the public.  Membership as of July 1990 includes
    over 1,200 addresses on four continents.  There is an FTP-accessible
    archives/repository of past traffic, software and papers.  The list
    is maintained by the Artificial Life Research Group, Computer Science
    Department, Lindley Hall 101, Indiana University Bloomington, IN 47405.
    There are conditions on redistribution of the list in order to minimize
    any misunderstanding or exaggeration concerning this new area of study.


Alspa
    Contact: alspa-users-request@ssyx.ucsc.edu  (Brad Allen)

    Purpose:  Discussion by owners/users of the CP/M machines
    made by (now defunct) Alspa Computer, Inc.

alternates
    Contact: alternates-request@ns1.rutgers.edu

    Purpose: Mail.alternates is a mail list for people who advocate,
    and/or practice an open sexual lifestyle. Its members are
    primarily bisexual men and women, and their SO's. Mail.alternates
    is intended as a forum, and support group for adult men and women
    who espouse their freedom of choice and imagination in human
    sexual relations, no matter what their orientaion. Those who are
    offended by frank, and uninhibited discussions relating to sexual
    issues should not subscribe.

    Moderator/Editor: amq@ns1.rutgers.edu 

Amazons International
    Contact: thomasg@ulrik.uio.no (Thomas Gramstad)

    Purpose: Amazons International is an electronic digest newsletter
    for and about Amazons (physically and psychologically strong 
    assertive women who are not afraid to break free from traditional
    ideas about gender roles, femininity and the female physique) and
    their friends and lovers.  Amazons International is dedicated to
    the image of the female hero in fiction and in fact, as it is
    expressed in art and literature, in the physiques and feats of
    female athletes, in sexual values and practices, and provides
    information, discussion and a supportive environment for these
    values and issues.  Gender role traditionalists and others who are
    opposed to Amazon ideals should not subscribe.

anneal
    Contact: anneal-request@cs.ucla.edu (Daniel R. Greening)

    Purpose: Discussion of simulated annealing techniques and
    analysis, as well as other related issues (stochastic
    optimization, Boltzmann machines, metricity of NP-complete move
    spaces, etc).
 
    Membership is restricted to those doing active research in
    simulated annealing or related areas.  Current membership is
    international, and about half of the members are published
    authors.  The list itself is unmoderated.

apc-open
    Contact: apc-open-request@uunet.uu.net (Fred Rump) -or-
			fred@compu.com

    Purpose: to interchange information relevant to SCO Advanced
    Product Centers. Membership restricted to APC OPEN members or
    those specifically invited.

argentina
    Contact: argentina-request@ois.db.toronto.edu (Carlos G. Mendioroz)

    Purpose:  Mailing list for general discussion and information.
    By joining you can learn about how to make those patties (empanadas)
    that you miss so much, you can discuss on how to 'cebar un buen mate',
    and of course, on how to solve Argentina's most outstanding problems.
    We don't have a regular news service yet, but some members send every
    now and then a briefing. To join send name, e-mail, phone number,
    address, and topics of interest.  List contents are primarily in
    Spanish.

artist-users
    Contact: artist-users-request@uicc.com (Jeff Putsch)

    Purpose: Discussion group for users and potential users of the Analog
    Artist software from Cadence Design Systems. This can be used to:
	* Discuss current problems & their solutions/workarounds.
	* Discuss usage of the product.
	* Discuss enhancements/product improvements.
	* Anything else regarding this product as an analog circuit
	  design environment.
    All users or potential users of Analog Artist are encouraged to join.

AR-News
    Contact: AR-News-Request@Think.Com (David Taylor)
                                       (Chip Roberson)

    Purpose: A public news wire for items relating to Animal Rights
    and Welfare.

    Appropriate postings to AR-News include: posting a news item,
    requesting information on some event, or responding to a request
    for information.  Discussions on AR-News will NOT be allowed and
    we ask that any commentary either be taken to AR-Talk or to
    private E-mail.

    Currently, no resources are available for archiving this list.

AR-Talk
    Contact: AR-Talk-Request@Think.COM (David Taylor)
                                       (Chip Roberson)

    Purpose: An unmoderated list for the discussion of Animal Rights.
    Peter Singer's book "Animal Liberation" proposes a "New Ethics for
    our Treatment of Animals" and many activist groups, such as PETA
    (People for the Ethical Treatment of Animals), regard this as the 
    "Bible of the Animal Rights movement."  Consumers and researchers
    alike are facing new questions concerning the human animals'
    treatment of the rest of the animal kingdom.  The purpose of this
    list is to provide students, researchers, and activists a forum for
    discussing issues like: Animal Rights, Animal Liberation, Consumer
    Product Testing, Cruelty-free products, Vivasection/Dissection,
    Medical Testing, Animals in Laboratories, Research using Animals,
    Hunting/Trapping/Fishing, Animals in Entertainment, Factory Farming,
    Fur, Ecology, Evnironmental Protection, Vegetarianism, Vegan
    lifestyles, Christian Perspectives, Other Perspectives.

    Currently, no resources are available for archiving this list. 

att-pc+
    Contact:  bill@ssbn.wlk.com  --or--
	      ...!{att,cs.utexas.edu,sun!daver}!ssbn!bill  (Bill Kennedy)

    Purpose: For people interested in the AT&T PC 63xx series of
    systems.  Sub-lists are maintained for MS-DOS-only and Simul-Task
    mailings as well as the full list for items of general interest.
    Membership must be requested and mail path verification is
    required before membership is granted.

autox
    Contact: autox-request@autox.team.net  
          or autox-request@hoosier.utah.edu

    Purpose: Discussion of autocrossing, SCCA Solo events.  Also
    available as a digest.
    Many of the list's members are SCCA(Sports Car Club of America).

Aviator
    Contact: aviator-request@ICDwest.Teradyne.COM (Jim Hickstein)

    Purpose: A mailing list of, by, and for user of Aviator (tm),
    the flight simulation program from Artificial Horizons, Inc.
    Aviator runs on Sun workstations with the GX graphics accelerator 
    option.  The list is unmoderated at present, and is unaffiliated 
    with AHI.

    Its charter is simply to facilitate communication among users of
    Aviator.  Note that it is *not* intended to communicate with the
    *providers* of Aviator.  All mail received at the submission address 
    will be reflected to all the subscribers of the list.

backstreets
    Contact: backstreets-request@virginia.edu	(Marc Rouleau)

    Purpose: Our purpose is to discuss any and all issues likely to be
    of interest to people who enjoy Bruce Springsteen's music.

bagpipe
    Contact: pipes-request@sunapee.dartmouth.edu

    Purpose: Any topic related to bagpipes, most generally defined as
    any instrument where air is forced manually from a bellows or bag
    through drones and/or over reeds.  All manner of Scottish, Irish,
    English, and other instruments are discussed.  Anyone with an
    interest is welcome. 

bahai-faith
    Contact: bahai-faith-request@oneworld.wa.com (Charles W. Cooper II)

    Purpose: a non-threatening forum for discussing and sharing 
    information about the tenets, history, and texts of the Baha'i
    Faith.  This mailing list is gatewayed into the Usenet newsgroup
    soc.religion.bahai.

balloon
    Contact: balloon-request@lut.ac.uk (Phil Herbert)

    Purpose: This is a list for balloonists of any sort, be they hot
    air or gas, commercial or sport. Currently the number of
    subscribers is low. Discussion topics include just about anything
    related to ballooning.

ballroom
    Contact: ballroom-request@athena.mit.edu  (Shahrukh Merchant
                                               c/o MIT Ballroom Dance Club)

    Purpose: Discussion of any aspect of Ballroom dancing.  For
    instance: Places to dance, announcement of special events (e.g.,
    inter- university competitions), exchange of information about
    clubs, ballroom dance music, discussion of dances, steps, etc.

    Anyone may join; please send ALL of the following information: (1)
    Full name (2) Internet-compatible e-mail address (3) Affiliation,
    if any, with any ballroom dance organization or group (4) ZIP or
    postal code, and country if other than U.S.  (5) Whether you have
    access to Netnews (Yes/No/Don't know/Yes but don't use).

bbones
    Contact: mail-bbones-request@yorku.ca

    Purpose: A list discussing the construction of mail backbones for
    organizations and campuses.  Created as a followup to a discussion 
    to the 1992 spring Inetrop hosted by Einger Stefferud.

bears
    Contact: bears-request@spdcc.COM (Steve Dyer & Brian Gollum)
             ...!{harvard,ima,linus,mirror}!spdcc!bears-request

    Purpose: Mail.bears is a mailing list in digest format for gay
    and bisexual men who are bears themselves and for those who enjoy
    the company of bears.  The exact definition of a "bear" seems to
    be a personal one, but it encompasses men who are variously cuddly,
    furry, perhaps stocky, or bearded.  Mail.bears is designed to be a
    forum to bring together folks with similar interests for conversation,
    friendship and sharing of experiences.  The tone of mail.bears
    will be determined by its members, but people uncomfortable with
    discussing sexually explicit topics via electronic mail should
    not subscribe.

BETA
    Contact: usergroup-request@mjolner.dk (Elmer Soerensen Sandvad)

    Purpose: A discussion forum for BETA users.  BETA is a modern
    object-oriented programming language with: Powerful abstraction
    mechanisms including class, subclass, virtual class, class
    variable, procedure, subprocedure, virtual procedure, procedure
    variable, coroutine, subcoroutine, virtual coroutine, coroutine
    variable, and many more, all unified to the ultimate abstraction
    mechanism: the pattern.  Other features include general block
    structure, coroutines, concurrency, strong typing, part objects,
    separate objects, and class-less objects.

Between-the-lines
    Contact: ez000018@bullwinkle.ucdavis.edu (Matthew Jung)   
         or  mkwong@sdcc13.ucsd.edu (Myra Wong)

    Purpose: Debbie Gibson fans & discussion.

big-DB
    Contact: big-DB@midway.uchicago.EDU		(Fareed Asad-Harooni)

    Purpose: Discussions pertaining to large data bases (generally
    greater than 1 million records) and large data base management
    systems such as IMS, DB2, and CCA's Model/204. Anyone having
    interests in large data base issues is welcome.

biosym
    Contact: dibug-request@avogadro.barnard.columbia.edu (Peter Shenkin)

    Purpose: For users of Biosym Technologies software.  This includes
    the products InsightII, Discover, Dmol, Homology, Delphi, and
    Polymer.  The list is not run by Biosym.

blackbird
    Contact: skunk-works-request@orchestra.ecn.purdue.edu

    Purpose: Discuss Lockheed special project planes, particular the
    Blackbird (A-12, YF-12 and SR-71) and U-2 programs.

BMW
    Contact: bmw-request@sol.crd.ge.com  (Richard Welty)

    Purpose:  discussion of cars made by BMW.

brasil
    Contact: bras-net-request@cs.ucla.edu (B. R. Araujo Neto)

    Purpose: Mailing list for general discussion and information.
    To join send name, e-mail, phone number, address, and topics of
    interest.  Portuguese is the main language of discussion.

brass
    Contact: brass-request@geomag.gly.fsu.edu  (Ted Zateslo)

    Purpose: A discussion group for people interested in brass musical
    performance and related topics, especially small musical ensembles
    of all kinds.

bread
    Contact: bread-request@onion.rain.com  (Jeff Beadles)

    Purpose:  Discussion, recipes, and talk about home bread-making
    machines. 

british-cars
    Contact: british-cars-request@autox.team.net   (Mark Bradakis)
          or british-cars-request@hoosier.utah.edu

    Purpose: Discussion of owning, repairing, racing, cursing and
    loving British cars, predominantly sports cars, some Land Rover
    and sedan stuff.  Also available as a digest. 

bugs-386bsd
    Contact: bugs-386bsd-request@ms.uky.edu

    Purpose: For 386bsd bugs, patches and ports.  Requirements to 
    join: interest in actively working on 386bsd to improve the 
    operating system for use by yourself and others.

bx-talk
    Contact: bx-talk-request@xzact.com (Darci L. Chapman)

    Purpose: bx-talk has been created for users of Builder Xcessory
    (BX) to discuss problems (and solutions!) and ideas for using BX.

    BX is a graphical user interface builder for Motif applicatons,
    sold by ICS.  Please note that this list is not associated
    with ICS (the authors of BX) in any way.  This list is unmoderated.

C-IBM-370
    Contact: {spsd,zardoz,felix,elroy}!dhw68k!C-IBM-370-request
	      C-IBM-370-request@dhw68k.cts.com  (David Wolfskill)

    Purpose: The C on IBM mainframes mailing list is a place to discuss
    aspects of using the C programming language on s/370-architecture
    computers -- especially under IBM's operating systems for that
    environment.

ca-firearms

    Contact: chan@portal.com (ca-firearms-request@portal.com)

    Purpose: Announcement and discussion of California firearms
    legislation and laws.  The list is not moderated and membership is
    open to anyone.

cabot
    Contact: cabot-request@sol.crd.ge.com (Richard Welty)

    Purpose:  official mailing list of the New York State Institute
    for Sebastian Cabot Studies.

camelot
    Contact: camelot-request@castle.ed.ac.uk (Chris Thornborrow)

    Purpose: A new mailing list on the subject of Arthurian legend and
    Grail Lore. The 'Matter of Britain', as it is known, in all its
    guises and all related subjects will be discussed in an
    unmoderated mailing list.

    Camelot is a forum for discussion of all Arthurian fields of
    interest.

Cards 
    Contact:  cards-request@tanstaafl.uchicago.edu (Keane Arase)

    Purpose: For people interested in collection, speculation and
    investing in baseball, football, basketball, hockey and other
    trading cards and/or memoribilia.  Discussion and want/sell lists
    are welcome.  Open to anyone.

Catholic
    Contact: catholic-request@dragon.com (Cindy Smith)
             
    Purpose: The CATHOLIC mailing list is a forum for Catholics who
    wish to discuss their discipleship to Jesus Christ in terms of
    the Catholic approach to Christianity.  "Catholic" is loosely
    defined as anyone embracing the Catholic approach to Christianity
    whether Roman Catholic, Anglo-Catholic, or Orthodox.  Protestants
    or non-Christians are invited to listen in on discussions, but 
    full-blown debates between Catholics adn Protestants are best carried 
    out in Internet's soc.religion.christian or talk.religion.misc
    newsgrops.  Discussions on ecumenism are encouraged.

    To join the list, send a 1 line mail message consisting of the
    word SUBSCRIBE on the first line of the message.

Catholic-action
    Contact: rfreeman@vpnet.chi.il.us (Richard Freeman)

    Purpose: Catholic-action is a moderated list concerned with
    Catholic evangelism, church revitalization, and preservation of
    Catholic teachings, traditions and values, and the vital effort to
    decapitate modernist heresy.

cavers
    Contact: cavers-request@m2c.org   -or- 
		harvard!m2c!cavers-request (John D. Sutter)

    Purpose: Information resource and forum for all interested in
    exploring caves. To join, send a note to the above address
    including your geographical location as well as e-mail address;
    details of caving experience and locations where you've caved; NSS
    number if you have one; and any other information that might be
    useful.

cdforum
    Contact: uunet!samsung!wizvax!cdforum-request  (Stephanie P. Gilgut)

    Purpose: To provide support/discuss/share experiences about gender
    related issues; Crossdressing, Transvestism, Transsexualism, etc.
    This list is in Digest Format.

chalkhills
    Contact: chalkhills-request@presto.ig.com (John M. Relph)

    Purpose: Chalkhills is a mailing list for the discussion of the
    music and records of XTC (the band).  Chalkhills is moderated and
    is distributed in a digest format.

chem-eng
    Contact:  trayms@cc.curtin.edu.au (Dr. Martyn Ray)

    Purpose:  An electronic newsletter on chemical engineering.

Chem-talk
    Contact: Dr. Manus Monroe, Chemistry Department, Marin Community College
	     ...!{ames,cbosgd}!pacbell!unicom!manus

    Purpose: As chemists, dialogue and conversation with other
    scientists are essential to stimulating or provoking new ideas.  As
    teachers and researchers, we can find the demands of our profession
    extensive, which may lead to a reduction in our ability to keep
    abreast of new data and changes in theories.  Sometimes,
    conversation helps to clarify articles, illuminate new perceptions
    of theories, and sustain us through our precarious journey in
    chemistry.  A solution to this problem or concern is the creation
    of efficient communication network using this mailing list.

chessnews
    Contact: chessnews-request@tssi.com (Michael Nolan)

    Purpose: The chessnews mailing list is a repeater for the Usenet
    newsgroup rec.games.chess.  this is a bi-directional repeater.
    Postings originating from Usenet are sent to the list, and those
    originating from the list are sent to rec.games.chess.

christian
    Contact: ames!elroy!grian!mailjc-request
	     mailjc-request@grian.cps.altadena.ca.us

    Purpose: To provide a non-hostile environment for discussion among
    christians.  Non-christians may join the list and "listen-in", but
    full blown debates between Christians and non-Christians are best
    carried out in talk.religion.misc or soc.religion.christian.

cisco
    Contact: cisco-request@spot.colorado.edu	(David Wood)

    Purpose: This list is for discussion of the network products from
    Cisco Systems, Inc; primarily the AGS gateway, but also the ASM
    terminal multiplexor and any other relevant products.  Discussions
    about operation, problems, features, topology, configuration,
    protocols, routing, loading, serving, etc are all encouraged.
    Other topics include vendor relations, new product announcements,
    availability of fixes and new features, and discussion of new
    requirements and desirables.

clu
    Contact: clu-sw-request@cs.utu.fi    -or-
             tucos!clu-sw-request@mcsun.eu.net  (Matti Jokinen)

    Purpose:  Exchange of CLU software and technical discussion of
    related topics.

CoCo
    Contact:  pecampbe@mtus5.BITNET (Paul E. Campbell)

    Purpose: Discussion related to the Tandy Color Computer (any
    model), OS-9 Operating System, and any other topics relating to the
    "CoCo", as this computer is affectionately known.

    Anyone wishing to be on the list should send me mail.  UUCP users,
    PLEASE NOTE: I need a nearby Internet or BITNET node to get things
    through to you reliably, so please send me a path in the form:
		  zeus!yourcomp!yourid@sun.COM

comix
    Contact: comix-request@world.std.com (Elizabeth Lear Newman)

    Purpose: Intended for talking about non-mainstream and independent
    comic books.  We generally don't talk about superheroes much, and
    we don't talk about Marvel Mutants at all.

commune
    Contact: commune-request@stealth.acf.nyu.edu  (Dan Bernstein)

    Purpose: To discuss the COMMUNE protocol, a TELNET replacement.
    The list is a mail reflector, commune-list@stealth.acf.nyu.edu.

compress
    Contact: {decvax,ucbvax}!vax135!petsd!joe

    Purpose: discussions about file compression, especially Lempel-Ziv
    algorithms.

Counterev-L
    Contact: ae852@yfn.ysu.edu (Jovan Weismiller)

    Purpose: This list is under the aegis of l'Alliance Monarchists 
    and is dedicated to promoting the cause of traditional monarchy
    and the Counter Revolution.  We believe in government based on
    natural law principles, decentralization, subsidiarity, an economy 
    based on the principles of distributive justice, and the defense of 
    traditional Western values.

    We believe in a Europe, United, Traditional, and Free from the
    Atlantic to the Urals, but we oppose the centralizing bureaucracy
    of the Maastricht treaty.  While we are based in the US, we are 
    affiliated with L'Alliance pour la maintenance de la France en Europe, 
    and we have members, as well as fraternal relations with the monarchist
    organizations, in most Western European countries.

    We work for the strengthening of existing monarchies, the restoration
    in those countries with a monarchist tradition, and the building up
    of an infrastructure appropriate to the instuaration of monarchy in
    those countries without a living monarchist tradition.

Croatian-News/Hrvatski-Vjesnik
    Contact: Croatian-News-Request@Andrew.CMU.Edu
          or Hrvatski-Vjesnik-Zamolbe@Andrew.CMU.Edu

    Purpose: News from Croatia, Slovenia, and other countries emerging
    from former parts of Yugoslavia are run by volunteers.   These are
    actually two news distributions: one in Croatian (occasionally an
    article can be in some other South Slavic language) and one in English.

    For subscription, please send a message with the following information:
    your name, your email address, state/country where your account is.
    Please put the state/country information in the 'Subject:' line of 
    your letter.  If you would like to receive the news in Croatian as
    well, please indicate that in your message.  If you would prefer to
    receive the news in Croatian ONLY, please send a message to the
    address Hrvatski-Vjesnik-Zamolbe@Andrew.CMU.Edu.

Cro-News/SCYU-Digest
    Contact: cro-news-request@mph.sm.ucl.ac.uk (Nino Margetic)

    Purpose: Cro-News: This non-moderated list is the distribution point 
    for the news coming from Croatia.  The list carries articles from 
    Danas, Slobodna Dalmacija, and Vjesnik.  The list carries also 
    occasional news items from the CN/HV lists.  This list was set up 
    to reduce the overseas traffic, so if you are in the USA/Canada, 
    please use the corresponding CN/HV USA address.  This list also 
    carries the SCYU- Digest traffic.  The languages are Croatian, English 
    and occasionally Slovene.  For application, only email address is 
    required.  If you wish to add your name to the CN/HV database, please 
    contact the USA coordinators.

    SCYU-Digest: This moderated mailing list enables people without 
    access to the USENET newsgroup soc.culture.yugoslavia to receive 
    messages published on the s.c.y in a digested form.  The volume of 
    the material depends on the traffic on the mentioned newsgroup, but 
    usually there is at least 700-800 lines of text daily.  The topics 
    cover wide ranging subjects and on occasions one can witness very 
    heated discussions between the participants.  Language is mostly 
    English.  The interaction is possible though the gateway at Berkeley.
    
cryonics
    Contact: ...att!whscad1!kqb  -or-  kqb@whscad1.att.com   (Kevin Q. Brown)

    Purpose: Cryonic suspension is an experimental procedure whereby
    patients who can no longer be kept alive with today's medical
    abilities are preserved at low temperatures for treatment in the
    future.  This list is a forum for topics related to cryonics,
    which include biochemistry of memory, low temperature biology,
    legal status of cryonics and cryonically suspended people,
    nanotechnology and cell repair machines, philosophy of identity,
    mass media coverage of cryonics, new research and publications,
    conferences, and local cryonics group meetings.

Cthulu
    Contact: cthulhu-request@cs.qmw.ac.uk

    Purpose: A mailing list for discussion about *the* horror frp. CoC.

ctree
    Contact:  alberta!oha!ctree-request  (Tony Olekshy)
    
    Purpose: The C-Tree mailing list provides a forum for the
    discussion of FairCom's C-Tree, R-Tree, and D-Tree products.  This
    mailing list is not associated with FairCom.  We have over three dozen
    members, amd cover virtually all hardware and operating system
    ports.

CUSSNET (Computer Users in the Social Sciences)
    Contact:  cussnet-request@stjhmc.fidonet.org
                 -or-
    {gatech,ames,rutgers}!ncar!noao!asuvax!stjhmc!cussnet-request

    Purpose: CUSSNET (Computer Users in the Social Sciences) is a
    network of students, faculty, and professionals working in a
    variety of social science/social service settings and who have
    concerns with practice, education, ethics, computerization, and
    career advancement, to name a few.  Many of the participants are
    students of social work, practicing social workers or social work
    educators; however, anyone with an interest in the human
    services/social sciences/social services areas is welcome to
    participate.  Recent topics have included ethics, computerization
    concerns, social work education topics, job announcements, and
    adaptive technology topics.

cyberpunkRPG
    Contact: cyberrpg-request@veritas.com

    Purpose: The cyberpunk mailing list is primarly for the
    discussion of cyberpunk role-playing games.  The discussion is not
    limited to any game system.  Subjects of a peripheral nature are
    welcome as long as they don't get out of hand.  There is one
    rule on this mailing list: the moderator gets to add new rules at
    will.

CZ
    Contact: cz-request@pram.cs.ucla.edu (Ted Kim)

    Purpose: The purpose of the "The Convergence Zone" (or CZ for
    short) is to discuss the Harpoon naval wargame series and related
    topics. This includes Harpoon, Captain's Edition Harpoon, Computer
    Harpoon, Harpoon SITREP and various supplements for print and
    computer versions. Naval topics are discussed in so far as they
    are related to the game or provide useful background. Discussion
    is moderated. CZ is packaged in a digest format. Listeners as well
    as contributors are welcome.

dark-shadows
    Contact: shadows-request@sunee.waterloo.edu (Bernie Roehl)

    Purpose: Dark Shadows was a daily soap opera that ran on ABC in
    the late sixties (ending in 1971).  It had a Gothic feel to it,
    and featured storylines involving witchcraft, vampires, werewolves
    and the supernatural.  It was (appropriately enough) "brought back
    from the dead" by NBC for a single season last year. It also
    spawned two feature films, a series of paperback novels, and lots
    more; the series is celebrating its 25th anniversary this year.
    There are a number of international fan clubs for the series, but
    so far there has been no newsgroup or (electronic) mailling list
    devoted to it.  Now there is.

datsun-roadsters
    Contact: datsun-roadsters-request@autox.team.net   (Mark J. Bradakis)
          or datsun-roadsters-request@hoosier.utah.edu 

    Purpose: To discuss any and all aspects of owning, showing,
    repairing, driving, etc. Datsun roadsters.

dead-runners
    Contact:  dead-runners-request@unx.sas.com (Christopher Mark Conn)

    Purpose: The Dead Runners Society is a mailing list for runners
    who like to talk about the psychological, philosophical, and
    personal aspects of running. We really like to talk about anything
    that has to do with running, but we tend to be more interested in
    how it affects our lives and our brains rather than our 10K times.
    The group is very diverse in experience - there are marathoners
    and there are people who just jog around the block.

Decision Power
    Contact: dp-friends-request@aiai.ed.ac.uk (Ken Johnson)

    Purpose: Decision Power is a product of ICL Computers Limited
    comprising of a logic programming language Prolog, a constraint
    handling system Chip, a data base interface Seduce (runs on top
    of Ingres), a development environment Kegi (runs on X) and an
    end-user graphical display environment KHS (also runs on X).  It
    is in use for various purposes at a dozen or so sites around the
    United Kingdom and Ireland.

decstation-managers
    Contact: decstation-managers-request@ornl.gov

    Purpose:  Fast-turnaround troubleshooting tool for managers of
    RISC DECstations.

derby
    Contact: derby-request@ekrl.com (John Wilkes)

    Purpose: To discuss various aspects and strategies of Horse
    Racing, primarily dealing with, but not limited to, handicapping.
    Anyone is free to join.

DGRD
    Contact: taylor@limbo.intuitive.com (Dave Taylor)

    Purpose: The digital games review digest is devoted to computer
    and video game reviews.  We're interested in just about any games
    that run on computers, including IBM PC, Atari, Amiga, Macintosh,
    Apple II and Unix computers, as well as video games for the
    Nintendo, Sega, NEC, Atari, and so on.  We also cover games for
    the portable market (e.g. the Atari Lynx and Nintendo GameBoy).

    This is a *REVIEWS ONLY* mailing list, with all submissions edited
    to fit into a common and consistent format.  Discussion of the
    relative merits of different gaming computers, technical
    discussion of resolution required to display 3D graphics, and
    general flaming and hostility will be left to the many different
    forums appropriate for that type of discussion.

dire-straits
    Contact: dire-straits-request (Rand P. Hall)
    To subscribe, send the one word, one line message SUBSCRIBE to the
    above address.

    Purpose: Discussion of the band Dire Straits and their side projects.

dirt-users
    Contact:  dirt-users-request@ukc.ac.uk

    Purpose:  Dirt is an X11-based UIMS.

disney-afternoon
    Contact: ranger-list-request@taronga.com (Stephanie da Silva)

    Purpose: Discussion of the Disney Afternoon and other related
    topics.

Donosy
    Contact:  przemek@ndcvx.cc.nd.edu  (Przemek Klosowski)

    Purpose:  Distribution of a news bulletin from Poland.
    English and Polish versions are both avaialble.

DragonQuest
    Contact: uunet!media!chado!dqlist-request

    Purpose: The DragonQuest mailing list is an unmoderated,
    undigested list for the discussion of the SPI-developed,
    TSR-owned, fantasy role- playing system. Discussions on all facets
    of the game, including (but not limited to) rules clarifications,
    game supplements, adventures, additional weapons/skills/Colleges
    of Magic, and information for new players/GMs, are welcome. This
    list is not, and will not ever be, archived.

drwho-spoilers
    Contact:  terminus!nyssa  (James Armstrong, Jr.)

    Purpose:  Branched off of rec.arts.drwho is a list for "Spoilers",
    which is intended to distribute news about upcoming seasons and
    discussion on recently released episodes and keep it away from the
    eyes of people who would rather not know until they see the shows
    themselves.
    		*** This group is currently inactive. ***
DSA-LGB
    Contact: DSA-LGB-request@midway.uchicago.edu
    
    DSA-LGB is a mailing list for members of the Lesbian/ Gay/Bisexual
    Commission of the Democratic Socialists of America, and for other
    people interested in discussing connections between sexual
    identity and the democratic socialist movement in the U.S. and
    other nations.  The list is neither archived nor moderated.

Dual-Personalities
    Contact: dual-personalities-request@darwin.uucp

    Purpose: Discussion, maintenance/survival tips, and commercial
    offerings for the System/83 UNIX box made by the now-defunct DUAL
    Systems Corp of Berkeley, as well as similar machines using the
    IEEE-696 bus (such as the CompuPro 8/16E with Root/Unisoft UNIX).

DVI-list
    Contact: dvi-list-request@calvin.dgbt.doc.ca (Andrew Patrick)

    Purpose: This mailing list is intended for discussions about Intel's DVI
    (Digital Video Interactive) system.  These discussions cover both
    applications and programming with DVI.

eastender
    Contact: eastender@karazm.math.uh.edu
    
    Purpose: Discussion of the BBC serial "EastEnders" as it is
    broadcast within the US.  UK'ers are invited, but be warned we're
    about two years behind the UK series.

echoes
    Contact: echoes-request@fawnya.tcs.com  (h.w. neff)

    Purpose: Info and commentary on the musical group Pink Floyd
    as well as other projects members of the group have been 
    involved with.

ECTL
    Contact: ectl-requests@snowhite.cis.uoguelph.ca (David Leip)

    Purpose: A List dedicated to Researchers interested in Computer
    Speech Interfaces.

edge
    Contact: bowers@elxsi.dfrf.nasa.gov (Al Bowers)

    Purpose: A mailing list for enthusiasts of edged weapons.  This
    list is presented to allow a forum of disscussion related to edged
    weapons.  Their uses, constructions and origins.

elements
    Contact: elements-request@telesoft.com (Gary Morris KK6YB)

    Purpose: The purpose of the Shuttle Elements mailing list is to
    get Keplerian Elements out as quickly as possible during flights.
    We send out pre-launch elements and post launch elements based
    on either Flight Dynamics Office predictions, Shuttle computer state
    vector data, or on NORAD radar tracking data.  Ayone may subscribe
    but prior approval is require before sending submissions to the list.

empire-list
    Contact: empire-list-request@bbn.com

    Purpose: Discussion of design and implementation issues of BSD
    Empire among authors and interested parties.

emtex-user
    Contact: emtex@methan.chemie.fu-berlin.de (Vera Heinau & Heiko Schlichting)
         or: emtex@fub.uucp 

    Conversation language: Changed to English (from German)
    Purpose: Information about emTeX, an implementation of TeX for MS-DOS
    and OS2. Discussions and infos about updates, bugs and sources of supply.

Episcopal
    Contact:	episcopal-request@dragon.com   (Cindy Smith)

    Purpose: The purpose of the EPISCOPAL mailing list is to provide a 
    non-hostile environment for discussion among Christians who are members 
    of the Holy Catholic Church in the Anglican Communion or who are simply 
    interested in Episcopal beliefs and practices.  Non-Anglicans and 
    non-Christians may join the list and listen in but full blown debates
    between Anglicans and Protestants/Roman Catholics/non-Christians are
    best carried out in soc.religion.christian and talk.religion.misc
    newsgroups.  It is hoped that the availability of this list will not
    diminish the contributions Christians make there.  Discussions on
    ecumenism are encourage.

    To join the list, send a 1 line mail message consisting of the
    word SUBSCRIBE on the first line of the message.

Epoch Users Group
    Contact: epuf-request@mcs.anl.gov

    Purpose: The Epoch Users Forum mailing list is intended as an ideas
    exchange mechanism for users of Epoch fileservers.  Comments, 
    questions, and feedback are encouraged.

esperanto
    Contact: esperanto-request@rand.org (Mike Urban)

    Purpose: This list is a forum for people interested in the neutral
    international language Esperanto.  Discussions about the language
    itself, the Esperanto movement, publications, and news are
    encouraged; of course, discussion *in* the language itself are
    especially encouraged, although English translations may be
    advisable when the material is of interest to beginners or
    non-Esperantists.

ethology
    Contact: saarikko@cc.helsinki.fi  (Jarmo Saarikko)

    Purpose: An unmoderated mailing list for the discussion of animal
    behaviour and behavioural ecology. Possible topics could be e.g.
    new or controversial theories, new research methods, and equipment.
    Announcements of books, papers, conferences, new software for
    behavioural analysis etc., with possible experiences, are also 
    encouraged.

euro-moto
    Contact: bowers@elxsi.dfrf.nasa.gov  (Al Bowers)
                or
             euro-moto@skipper.dfrf.nasa.gov  (Al Bowers)
 
    Purpose: Topics covering all aspects of European motorcycles, for
    enthusiasts of pavement, dirt, classic, modern, rare or common
    European motorcycles.

exotic-cars
    Contact: exotic-cars-request@amix.commodore.com (Joe Augenbraun)

    Purpose: Discussion about exotic and limited production
    automobiles, including maintenance, driving impressions, artistic
    nits, and any other aspect of the world's rarest and most
    desirable cars.

Extropians
    Contact: extropians-request@gnu.ai.mit.edu

    Purpose: The unifying characteristic of the list recipients is
    their latest interest in anarchocapitalist politics, techniques
    of life extension (including cryonics), the technological extension
    of human intelligence and perception, nanotechnology, spontaneous
    orders, memetics, and a number of other related ideas.  If these
    topics seem to you to be naturally related and mutually consistent,
    you might already be an Extropian.

    All Extropians (and those who suspect that they are Extropians)
    are invited to join.

From arielle@taronga.com Mon Jul 27 13:49:01 1992
From: arielle@taronga.com (Stephanie da Silva)
Newsgroups: news.lists,news.announce.newusers,news.answers
Subject: Publicly Accessible Mailing Lists, Part II
Date: 18 Jul 92 18:01:44 GMT
Followup-To: poster
Organization: Taronga Park BBS
Supersedes: <0JLGFLK@taronga.com>

Archive-name: mailing-lists/part2


[This is the second of of three articles on mailing lists.]

f-body
    Contact:  f-body-request@boogie.ebay.sun.com  (Richard Koch)

    Purpose:  discussion of Camaros and Firebirds.

f-mac
    Contact: brunyan%utmem2.bitnet@cunyvm.cuny.edu  (Bill Runyan)

    Purpose: Information on commentary on the musical group Fleetwood
    Mac as well as any work or projects that any of the members have
    been involved with, such as the solo work of singer Stevie Nicks.

femail
    Contact: femail-request@lucerne.eng.sun.com (Ellen Eades)

    Purpose: The femail mailing list is intended to provide a forum
    for discussion of issues of interest to women, in a friendly
    atmosphere. The basic tenets of feminism and the day-to-day
    experiences of women do not have to be explained or defended.  Men
    and women can join, but everyone requesting to be added to the
    mailing list MUST provide the moderator with: 1) a full name; 2) a
    complete uucp path to a well-known host or a fully specified
    Internet address; 3) the correspondent's gender (for records and
    statistics only).  NO exceptions.

feminism-digest
    Contact: feminism-digest@ncar.ucar.edu (Cindy Tittle Moore)

    Purpose: This is actually a digest version of soc.feminism.  It is
    intended for those who have difficulty getting soc.feminism or who
    prefer to read it all at once or whatever.

ferrets
    Contact: ferret-request@ferret.ocunix.on.ca (Chris Lewis)
	     {utzoo,utai,uunet}!cunews!latour!ecicrl!ferret-request

    Purpose: This is a mailing list for people who have or are merely
    interested in ferrets (Mustela Furo).  Discussions are welcome on
    any subject relating to ferrets -- suitability as pets, health
    information, funny ferret stories etc.

Fiction-Writers
    Contact: writers-request@studguppy.lanl.gov  (Doug Roberts)

    Purpose: The Fiction Writers Group exists for two purposes:

      To give people interested in writing fiction professionally a
      support group of peers for where information can be shared and
      discussions of the task of writing can be carried on.

      To create an environment where Works In Progress can be passed
      around and criticized so that the author can find the weak spots
      and polish the manuscript into a salable work.

    The group has handled mostly Science Fiction, Fantasy, and related
    genres, but is not restricted to them.  Membership is open to
    anyone who has in interest in writing fiction regardless of
    previous experience or published/unpublished status.

    Members must be prepared to regularly contribute either by
    critiquing the work of others or presenting work for critique.

filmmakers
    Contact: filmmakers-request@grissom.larc.nasa.gov

    Purpose: The Filmmakers' Mailing List deals with all aspects of
    motion picture production, with an emphasis on technical issues.
    Heavily stressed are construction and design issues for those
    working on tight budgets.  It should be emphasized that the subject
    is film, and not video.

firearms
    Contact: firearms-request@cs.cmu.edu (Karl Kleinpaste)

    Purpose: The mailing list firearms has been created to provide
    an environment in which sportsmen can discuss issues of concern to
    them.  Topics include but are not limited to hunting, firearms
    safety, legal issues, reloading tips, maintenance suggestions,
    target shooting, and dissemination of general info. Anyone is
    welcome to join -- note that we do NOT intend to discuss the merits
    of gun control.

flamingo
    Contact: flamingo-request@esd.sgi.com (Laura Beatty) 

    Purpose: The list is for discussion among fans of the series
    "Parker Lewis Can't Lose" on the Fox television network.  It is
    unmoderated.  It is available both as a mail reflector and as a
    digest.  The two formats distribute the same material, please
    state your preference when you subscribe.

flashlife
    Contact: flashlife-request@netcom.com (Carl Rigney)

    A mailing list for GMs of Shadowrun and other cyberpunk
    roleplaying games to discuss rules, scenarios, ask questions,
    make up answers, and similar fasfax.

Flat-Fields
    Contact: Flat-Fields-Request@ucscb.ucsc.edu

    Purpose: Discussion of Bauhaus and the groups that came out of it.
    Also Gothic/Death Rock in general.

folk-dancing
    Contact:	tjw@unix.cis.pitt.edu	(Terry J. Wood)
		{allegra,bellcore,cadre}!pitt!unix.cis.pitt.edu!tjw
		tjw@pittvms.bitnet

    Purpose: Any discussion of FOLK dancing. Areas of dance would
    include, but not be limited to: international, contra, square,
    western square morris, cajun, and barn dancing, etc.

    Please feel free to discuss such things as touring groups,
    artists, camps, workshops, styling, equipment, recordings, and so
    on.  This mailing list also welcomes queries about where to find
    dance groups and how to get started dancing.

    Please note that the Folk Dancing Mailing List (FDML) operates in
    conjunction with the USENET newsgroup Rec.folk-dancing.  Material
    in Rec.folk-dancing appears in the FDML.  This mailing list is
    primarily for people who can not (or do not wish to) receive
    USENET.

    When subscribing to the FDML, please include several computer mail
    addresses AND a postal mail address (or phone number) as a last
    resort.

FoxPro
    Contact: shevett@amber.mccc.edu (Dave Shevett)

    Purpose: Conversations relating to the FoxPro database system
    under PCDOS.  Versions 1.02 and the new 2.0 system discussed.

framers
    Contact: uunet!drd!framers-request
            framers-request@drd.com (Mark Lawrence)
    
    Purpose: A users forum for sharing of experiences and information
    about the framemaker desktop publishing package from Frame
    Technologies.  The framemaker package is prevalent on UNIX
    workstations (including NeXT), MacIntoshes and PCs running MS-Windows.  
    This list is _not_ a replacement for 'comments@frame.com' (the 
    vendor's support e-mail address).

fsuucp
    Contact: fsuucp-request@polyslo.calpoly.edu (Christopher J. Ambler)

    Purpose: The FSUUCP mailing list is for the discussion, bug
    hunting, feature proposing, and announcements of the availability
    and release dates of FSUUCP, an MSDOS UUCP/mail/news package.
    FSUUCP is shareware, and includes uucico/uuxqt (with support for
    rmail and rnews (single, batched and compressed batch)), as well
    as readnews, postnews, mail, expire, uuq, uusnap, uulog, and a
    host of utilities.


funky-music
    Contact: funky-music-request@apollo.lap.upenn.edu (George Zipperlen) -or-
      ...!rutgers!super.upenn.edu!apollo.lap.upenn.edu!funky-music-request

    Purpose: The funky-music mailing list is for the discussion of funk
    music, as well as rap, hip-hop, soul, r&b, and related varieties.
    Discussions of zydeco, reggae, salsa, soca, and similar gutsy
    street music are also welcome.

    Funk music is based on the rhythmic innovations pioneered by James
    Brown.  Other notable artists in the genre are Parliament,
    Funkadelic, War, Earth Wind and Fire, the Meters, and Mandrill.

    Funky music has a dance-able beat to it, a soulful feel, and an
    underlying intelligence.  All the varieties of music mentioned
    above, are funky.

glove-list
    Contact:  listserv@karazm.math.uh.edu  (J. Eric Townsend)

    Purpose: Discussion of the Nintendo PowerGlove, a > $100 dataglove.
    To subscribe, send email to listserv@karazm.math.uh.edu with a
    *BODY* of "subscribe glove-list  you@yoursite.domain."

godlygraphics
    Contact: request-godlygraphics@sparc.vitro.com (Steve Brailsford)

    Purpose: The godlygraphics mailing list is for the discussion of
    Christian uses of computer graphics and animations, especially
    using the Amiga computer, and for related trading of ideas, objects,
    images, and even joint projects, such as the design of a Christian
    computer game.
    The possibilities for innovative uses of computer graphics, 
    animations, multimedia applications and video productions in support
    of various Christian ministries and other endeavors are WIDE OPEN.
    What better use of your technical skills or creative talents than to
    serve the One who gave them to you?  Any interested or curious 
    Christian is welcome to join.

gnu-manual
    Contact:
    	internet: gnu-manual-request@a.cs.uiuc.edu
    	usenet:   uiucdcs!gnu-manual
    
    Purpose: "gnu-manual" members are volunteers who write, proofread,
    and comment on documents for a GNU Emacs Lisp programmers' manual.

GRASS
    Contact: grass-server@wharton.upenn.edu

    Purpose: The GRASS (Generic Religions and Secret Societies)
    mailing list is a forum for the development of religions and
    secret societies for use in role-playing games. Both real-world
    and fictional religions and secret societies are covered. GRASS is
    an erratic volume, high signal-to-noise, mailing list.

    To subscribe, send mail to the CONTACT address with a subject of
    SUBSCRIBE Charlie Bucket. (Use your own name instead of Charlie's
    though!)

gug-sysadmins
    Contact: gug-sysadmins-request@vlsivie.tuwien.ac.at

    Purpose: Distributions of rumors, bugfixes and work-arounds
    concerning the CAD-Tool genesil and related tools to members of
    the Eurochip project and other interested parties.

Gunk'l'dunk
    Contact: jeremy@stat.washington.edu (Jeremy York)

     Purpose : A forum for discussing and promoting _Tales_of_the_
    _Beanworld_, an unusual black and white comic published by Eclipse
    comics.  It is a moderated newsletter that occasionally receives
    input from the creator of the Beanworld, Larry Marder.

GURPS
    Contact: milliken@bbn.com (Walter Milliken)

    Purpose: The GURPS Digest is a collection of articles, discussion,
    and material related to Steve Jackson Games's GURPS role-playing
    game, including selected material from the Steve Jackson Games
    BBS.

handicap
    Contact: wtm@bunker.shel.isc-br.com

    Purpose:  The Handicap Digest provides an information/discussion
    exchange for issues dealing with the physically/mentally
    handicapped.  Topics include, but are not limited to: medical,
    education, legal, technological aids and the handicapped in
    society.

    Note: The articles from the Handicap Digest are also posted in the
    Usenet Newsgroup, "misc.handicap".

hang-gliding
    Contact: hang-gliding@midway.uchicago.EDU	(Fareed Asad-Harooni)

    Purpose: Topics covering all aspects of hang-gliding and ballooning,
    for ultra-light and lighter-than-air enthusiasts.

    A second list may be joined by mailing to
    hang-gliding@virginia.edu (Galen Hekhuis).

Harleys
    Contact: harley-request@thinkage.on.ca (Ken Dykes)
             -or-  harley-request@thinkage.com
             -or-  uunet!thinkage!harley-request

    Purpose: discussion about the bikes, politics, lifestyles, and
    anything else of interest to Harley-Davidson lovers.

health-ed
    Contact:  health-ed-request@stjhmc.fidonet.org (David Dodell)

    Purpose: HEALTH-ED is a conference area dealing with Health
    Education.  Any topic dealing with ideas, problems, or solutions
    is acceptable.  The area is intended for use by health educators
    and education coordinators.

hey-joe
    Contact: hey-joe-request@ms.uky.edu (Joel Abbott)

    Purpose: Discussion and worship of Jimi Hendrix and his music.
    Although Jimi has been dead for about 2 decades, we feel that
    his music is still worthy to be recognized.  Prerequisite to
    joining:  appreciation for his music.

homebrew
    Contact: homebrew-request%hpfcmr@hplabs.hp.com
          or ...!hplabs!hpfcmr!homebrew-request (Rob Gardner)

    Purpose: Forum on Beer, homebrewing, and related issues. Though
    mainly intended for discussion of beer making, also welcome are
    discussions on making cider, mead, wine, or any other fermented
    (but not distilled) beverage. Beginners are welcomed as well 
    as experienced brewers.

home-ed
    Contact: home-ed-request@ima.isc.com  (Rowan Hawthorne)

    Purpose: This mailing list is for the discussion of all aspects
    and methods of home education.  These include the "unschooling"
    approach, curricula-based home-schooling, and others.  The list
    is currently unmoderated and welcomes everyone interested in
    educating their children at home, whatever the reasons.

horse
    Contact: equestrians-request@world.std.com (David C. Kovar)

    Purpose: Discussion of things equestrian.  Horse enthusiasts of
    all disciplines and levels of experience are welcome.  Articles
    are distributed periodically in digest format, and also appear
    individually in the Usenet newsgroup "rec.equestrian".

hotrod
    Contact: hotrod-request@dixie.com
    Include on the Subject: line the keyword "subscribe" and a
    return path to your site.

    Purpose: The mailing list hotrod@dixie.com is chartered to provide
    a forum for people interested in high performance vehicles to
    exchange ideas and discuss topics of current interest.  This list
    is chartered as broadly as possible consistent with noise supression.
    Explicitly acceptable is any discussion regarding increasing the
    performance of any vehicle with more than three wheels.

huskers
    Contact: huskers-request@tssi.com (Michael Nolan)

    Purpose: this lists provides coverage of University of Nebraska
    sports.  The major in-season sports (football, basketball) will
    likely make up the majority of posts, but other sports are likely
    to be mentioned from time to time, depending on the interest.
    Other items likely to be of interest to NU alums or Cornhusker
    fans may also appear.

hyperami
    Contact: listserv@archive.oit.unc.edu

    Purpose: For informal product discussion and mutual assistance
    concerning AmigaVision, CanDo, DeluxeVideo III, Director 2, 
    Foundation, Hyperbook, InterActor, PILOT, ShowMaker, TACL,
    Thinker, and VIVA.

    To join, send a mail request to listserv@archive.oit.unc.edu and 
    give a one-line message asking "subscribe hyperami." 

    This list is separate from the Usenet newsgroup comp.sys.amiaga.
    multimedia but material from the list may occasionally be posted
    to the newsgroup.

hyperbole
hyperbole-announce
    Contact: hyperbole-request@cs.brown.edu (Bob Weiner)
    Use the following format on your Subject: line to execute requests,
    where you substitute your own values for the <> delimited items
    (include the period at the end of the line).

    Subject: Add <firstname-lastname> '<' <user>@<domain> '>' to
    <mail-list-name-without-domain>.  
    For example: Subject: Add Joe Smith <joe@mot.com> to hyperbole.

    Purpose: Hyperbole is for discussion of the Hyperbole systems and the
    related topics of hypertext and information retrieval.
    
    Hyperbole-announce announces new releases and bug fixes for
    Hyperbole.  Anyone on hyperbole is automatically subscribed to
    hyperbole-announce., so you should request subscription to only
    one of the two lists.

    Hyperbole is a flexible hypertext manager developed at Brown
    University that sits atop of GNU Emacs and provides efficient
    point-and-click information access and full customizability in GNU
    Emacs Lisp.  Hyperbole allows hypertext buttons to be embedded within
    unstructured and structured files, mail messages and news articles.
    It also provides point-and-click access to ftp archives, Wide Area
    Information Servers (WAIS), and the World-Wide Web (WWW) hypertext
    system.
    
IBDlist
    Contact: IBDlist-request%mvac23@udel.edu (Thomas Lapp) --or--
             ...!udel!mvac23!IBDlist-request

    Purpose: IBDlist is a moderated mailing list which discusses all
    aspects of Inflammatory Bowel Diseases, with particular emphasis
    on Crohn's disease and Ulcerative Colitis.  Anyone with an
    interest in these diseases, whether direct or indirect is welcome.
    This list will also act as a clearinghouse for information and
    discussion of current treatments, research, and other information
    related to IBDs.  This list is open to any interested party and is
    not restricted to those with a direct link to IBD.

iclinfo
    Contact: {obdient,tfd}!tons61!iclinfo

    Purpose: To update and relay information regarding the CCI/ICL
    processors.  Including information on product updates, product
    problems, service problems and information, system options, and
    information on CCI/ICL from "off-line" sources.....(i.e. Inside
    "scoops" direct from "hidden" CCI/ICL sources.

IDOL
    Contact: idol-group-request@luvthang.aquin.ori-cal.com (David Talmage)

    Purpose: The idol-group is an unmoderated mailing list for people
    interested in the Idol language.  Idol, an "Icon-derived object
    language," is "an object-oriented extension and environment for
    the Icon programming language." The idol-group is a forum for
    discussing Idol programming, object-oriented programming, and Idol
    implementation issues.  It is also a place to exchange Idol
    classes and programs, contributing to the library of useful Idol
    code.

il-info
    Contact: il-info-request@han.paramax.com

    Purpose: Discussion of Interactive Literature and the activities
    of the Interactive Literature Foundation (ILF).  The purpose of
    the Interactive Literature Foundation is to study and promote all
    forms of Interactive Literature, defined as any kind of narrative
    in which a participatory process between the author or performer
    and the reading, viewing, or attending audience determines or
    influences the plot of the story.

    Much of the current discussion on the list concerns Live-Action
    Role Playing Games, which evolved out of improvisational theatre,
    conventional role-playing games, and complex "assassin"-type
    games.  A typical game might involve thirty to eighty players
    taking the part of characters in a situation, with network of
    interconnecting motivations that provide the driving force for the
    action in the game.  Live games have a small set of rules that
    simulate activities that would be impractical or unsafe to play
    out, and to simulate abilities of the character that the player
    may not possess.  The majority of play consists of interacting
    with the other players "in character" to accomplish your
    character's goals and discover new ones.  Games have been run with
    science fiction, fantasy, historical, and literary themes, as well
    as others that are difficult to classify. 

    The mailing list is not limited to discussion of live games, and
    is open to discussion of anything that might be considered
    Interactive Literature.  This list is not moderated.

    Subscribe to il-info to find out about events in your area, and
    participate in or listen to discussion on writing good interactive
    listerature and the pros and cons of different styles.  Il-info
    can also provide information on how to join the Interactive
    Literature Foundation, and the benefits of membership.

immune
    Contact: immune-request@weber.ucsd.edu (Cyndi Norman)

    Purpose: A support group for people with immune-system breakdowns
    (and their symptoms) such as Chronic Fatigue Syndrome, Lupus,
    Candida, Hypoglycemia, Multiple Allergies, Learning Disabilities,
    etc, and their SO's, medical caretakers, etc.  The group is
    unmoderated and open to anyone anywhere in the world (no arguments
    about whether or not these disabilities exist).

impulse
    Contact:  impulse-users-request@j.cc.purdue.edu  (Kevin Braunsdorf)

    Purpose:  A low-volume list for users of the LPC Mpulse line of
    computers.  The moderator does filter and journalize submissions.

info-aids
    Contact: info-aids@rainbow.UUCP	--or--
	     {pacbell,apple,hoptoad,ucbvax}!well!rainbow!info-aids  (Ken Davis)

    Purpose: to act as a clearinghouse for information, and discussion
    about AIDS, including alternative treatments, political
    implications, etc.   Exchanges files with AIDNEWS@RUTVM1.BITNET.
    Open to anyone with the time and inclination to participate.
    Mailing list will be confidential and known only to the members.
    Anonymous postings will be accepted.  (See also "aids" mailing list)

info-altos
    Contact: info-altos-request@tiamat.fsc.com  (Jim O'Connor & Mike Johnson)

    Purpose: Information and discussion about Altos computers.

info-ccc
    Contact: uunet!xurilka!info-ccc-request (Luigi Perrotta)

    Purpose: The info-ccc mailing list will be devoted to the
    Concurrent C and Concurrent C++ programming languages.  However,
    discussions can be anything relevant to concurrent programming.

info-encore
    Contact: info-encore-request@cs-gw.D.UMN.EDU	--or--
	     info-encore-request@umnd-cs.UUCP	  (Dan Burrows)

    Purpose: Mailing list for discussion of issues involving hardware
    and software issues of Encore computers and ethernet terminal
    servers.

    This mailing list is also gatewayed into the inet list, 
    comp.sys.encore

info-fortune
    Contact: info-fortune-request@csd4.csd.uwm.edu (Thomas Krueger)

    Purpose: This mailing list is for users of UNIX based
    microcomputers produced by Fortune Systems. Any subject pertaining
    to Fortune computers is allowed.

info-futures
    Contact: harvard!bu-cs!info-futures-request		-or-
	     info-futures-request@cs.bu.edu

    Purpose: To provide a speculative forum for analyzing current and 
    likely events in technology as they will affect our near future in
    computing and related areas.

info-gnu
    Contact:
    	info-gnu-request@prep.ai.mit.edu	--or--
    	ucbvax!prep.ai.mit.edu!info-gnu-request

    Purpose: to distribute progress reports on the GNU Project, headed
    by Richard Stallman, and to ask members for various kinds of help.
    The list is gated both ways with the alternative newsgroup
    "gnu.announce," and is filtered (weakly moderated) by Leonard H.
    Tower Jr.  GNU, which stands for Gnu's Not Unix, is the name for a
    complete Unix-compatible software system whose sources can be given
    away free to everyone.  Major parts have already been written;
    major parts still remain undone.  Project GNU has additional
    mailing lists to distribute information about specific GNU
    programs, and to report bugs in them.  Contact us at the above
    address for details.

info-high-audio
    Contact: info-high-audio-request@csd4.csd.uwm.edu (Thomas Krueger)

    Purpose: This list is for the exchange of subjective comments about
    high end audio equipment and modifications performed to high end
    pieces.  Techniques used to modify equipment, especially, but not
    limited to, vacuum tube electronics are exchanged. Some comments
    may be subjective or intuitive and may not yet have a measurable
    basis. Other topics of discussion include turntables, arms and
    cartridges; preamplifiers, headamps and cartridge matching;
    speakers, amplifiers and matching; placement of speakers, and room
    treatments. Any comments that prevent an open exchange of ideas and
    techniques are not encouraged.

    Archives of projects will be maintained on csd4.csd.uwm.edu and
    available via anonymous ftp.  Info-High-Audio is bi-directionally
    gatewayed with the USENET newsgroup rec.audio.high-end.

info-honda
    Contact: info-honda-request@cs.ucla.edu (Rich Wales)

    Purpose: Discussion of Honda and Acura automobiles.

info-ingres
    Contact: info-ingres-request@math.ams.com

    Purpose:  To discuss the commercial version of Ingres.

info-prime
    Contact: Info-Prime-Subscribe@List.Kean.EDU  (automated subscription)
   	     Info-Prime-Request@List.Kean.EDU

    Purpose: INFO-PRIME is the discussion group/mailing list for users
    and administrators of Prime Computer equipment: 50-series (PRIMOS)
    and EXL series (Unix).

info-solbourne
    Contact: info-solbourne-request@acsu.buffalo.edu  (Paul Graham)

    Purpose:  Discussions & info about Solbourne computers.

info-stratus
    Contact: Info-Stratus-Request@mike.lrc.edu (Richard Shuford)

    Purpose: This electronic mailing list is a user-centered and
    user-conducted forum for discussing the fault-tolerant machines
    produced by Stratus Computer Corporation and also their cousins,
    the IBM System/88 and Olivetti CPS-32.

    Info-Stratus is not intended to replace the vendor-provided
    support channels but to complement them.  Subscribers to
    Info-Stratus will exchange technical information and tap the
    collective experience of a host of other professionals who use or
    develop software on Stratus- architecture systems, or who
    configure and maintain hardware in the Stratus environment.

info-tahoe
    Contact:	info-tahoe-request@uwm.edu  --or--
		uwm!info-tahoe-request   (Jim Lowe)

    Purpose: Discussions pertaining to the Tahoe type of CPU.  These
    include the CCI Power 6/32, the Harris HCX/7, and the Sperry 7000
    series computers.

    The info-tahoe mailing list is set up as a mail reflector.

    This mailing list is also gatewayed into the inet list, 
    comp.sys.tahoe

info-vm
    Contact: info-vm-request@uunet.uu.net (Kyle Jones, and others)

    Purpose: Discussion and information exchange about the VM mail
    reader, which runs under GNU Emacs.

info-vw
    Contact: info-vw-request@ames.arc.nasa.gov

    Purpose: This is a list for those who own, or are interested in,
    Volkswagens. Both air and water-cooled models are discussed.

informix-list
    Contact:  informix-list-request@rmy.emory.edu  (Walt Hultgren)

    Purpose: An unmoderated list for the discussion of Informix
    software and related subjects.  Topics include all Informix
    offerings, from C-ISAM to WingZ, plus third-party products.
    Membership is open to anyone, including end-users, vendors and
    employees of Informix Software, Inc.  An optional gateway service
    of Informix-related articles from comp.databases is offered.  Not
    affiliated with Informix Software, Inc.

interest-groups
    Contact: nnsc.nef.net (128.89.1.178)

    Purpose: There is a document, "interest-groups", that can be
    obtained by anonymous ftp from nnsc.nef.net.  The document contains 
    a listing of most, if not all, of the current mailing lists.

International Trade & Commerce
    Contact: info-request@tradent.wimsey.bc.ca

    Purpose: Discussions of International Trade, Commerce and the global
    economy including postings of company profiles, trade leads and
    topics pertaining to entrepreneurial ventures.

InterText
    Contact: intertxt@network.ucsd.edu (Jason Snell)

    Purpose: InterText is a bi-monthly fiction magazine with over
    1000 subscribers worldwide.  InterText publishes in two formats:
    straight ASCII and PostScript (for Postscript compatible laser
    printers).  For more information, to ask about subscribing, or for
    submission guidelines, maili intertxt@network.ucsd.edu.  Back
    issues may be FTPed from network.ucsd.edu, in the /intertext
    directory.

ipsc-managers
    Contact: ipsc-managers-request@karazm.math.uh.edu (J Eric Townsend)

    Purpose: Discussion of administrating the Intel iPSC line of parallel
    computers.

isdn
    Contact: isdn-request@aball.in-berlin.de (Andreas Jennen)

    Purpose: Discussion about ISDN and digital telephone in Germany
    and Europe.  

irchat
    Contact: irchat-request@cc.tut.fi (Kai 'Kaizzu' Kein{nen)

    Purpose: Discussion on irchat.el, a GNU Emacs interface to IRC,
    the Internet Relay Chat.

italian-cars
    Contact: italian-cars-request@sol.crd.ge.com (richard welty)
	       -or-   ...!uunet!sol.crd.ge.com!italian-cars-request

    Purpose: discussion of italian-made automobiles

iti151
    Contact:    iti151-request@oce.orst.edu   (Paul O'Neill)
	        {tektronix, hplabs!hp-pcd}!orstcs!oce.orst.edu!iti151-request

    Purpose: For users of Imaging Technology's series 150 and 151 image
    processing systems and ITEX151 software.  The goal is to share
    algorithms, code, tricks, pitfalls, advice, etc. in an effort to
    decrease development time and increase functionality for the users
    of these systems.  (Also, despite their good support, we customers
    may want to gang up on ITI someday!!)

jewish
    Contact: avi_feldblum@att.com (Avi Feldblum)

    Purpose: The mailing list provides a non-abusive forum for
    discussion of Jewish topics with an emphasis on Jewish law.
    Debates between Jews and non-Jews or between various factions of
    Judaism should be posted to talk.religion.misc.

jump-in-the-river
    Contact: jump-in-the-river-request@presto.ig.com  (Michael C. Berch)
    -or- {apple,ames,rutgers}!bionet!ig!jump-in-the-river-request

    Purpose: Jump-in-the-river is a mailing list for the discussion of
    the music and recordings of Sinead O'Connor, and related matters
    such as lyrics, tour information.  Unmoderated.

khoros
    Contact: khoros-request@chama.unm.edu

    Purpose: to discuss the khoros software package, developed by Dr.
    Rasure, his staff, and his students at the University of New
    Mexico.  Khoros is an integrated software development environment
    for information processing and visualization, based on X11R4.

killifish
    Contact: killie-request@mejac.palo-alto.ca.us

    Purpose: For people who keep and are interested in killifish, (family
    cyprinodontidae).

kites
    Contact: 
    (USA/Canada/Europe):
	kites-request@harvard.harvard.edu    harvard!kites-request
    (Japan):
	koscvax.keio.junet!kites-request

    Purpose: This mailing list is for people interested in making,
    flying, or just talking about all kinds of kites.  Topics will (I
    hope) include kite plans and construction techniques, reviews of
    commercially available kites and plans, timely (or otherwise) human
    interest notes, and talk about flying.

Kuharske Bukve
    Contact: Kuharske-Bukve@IJS.AC.Mail.YU (Polona Novak & Andrej Brodnik)
             Kuharske-Bukve@Uni-LJ.AC.Mail.YU

    Purpose: "Kuharskve bukve" is a moderated mailing list published
    weekly.  Each issue brings one recipe previously tested by a member
    of editorial board.  The recipes are formated.  Language in them is
    Slovene only.  The editors are happy to receive readers' opinions.

lang-lucid
    Contact: lang-lucid-request@csl.sri.com  (R. Jagannathan)

    Purpose: Discussions on all aspects related to the language Lucid,
    including (but not restricted to) language design issues,
    implementations for personal computers, implementations for
    parallel machines, language extensions, programming environments,
    products, bug reports, bug fixes/workarounds.

lasnet
    Contact: lasnet-request@emx.utexas.edu	(Langston James Goree VI)

    Purpose: To facilitate the exchange of information among scholars
    doing research related to Latin America.

lds
    Contact: lds-request@decwrl.dec.com	   -or-    decwrl!lds-request

    Purpose: a forum for members of The Church of Jesus Christ of
    Latter-day Saints (mormons) to discuss church doctrine, mormon
    culture and life in general.  Non-members are welcome to join, but
    we're not interested in flame wars.  

liberal-judaism
    Contact: faigin@aerospace.aero.org (Daniel Faigin)

    Purpose: Non-judgemental discussions of liberal judaism (Reform,
    Reconstructionist, Conservative, Secular Humanist, etc.) and
    liberal jewish issues, its practices, opinions, and beliefs.

    This list is moderated and is in digest format.

libernet
    Contact: libernet-request@dartmouth.edu (Barry S. Fagin)

    Purpose: Libernet is a Libertarian mailing list.  The list is
    available in two modes: as a mail reflector and as a digest.

LickVista
    Contact: InfoVista-request@helios.ucsc.edu (Steve Allen)

    Purpose: Discussion of the use and development of the Vista
    astronomical data reduction package which originated at
    Lick Observatory.

Linda
    Contact: linda-users-request@cs.yale.edu
	     linda-users-request@yalecs.bitnet
	     {cmcl2,decvax,harvard}!yale!linda-users-request

    Purpose:  Discussion group for users and potential users of Linda
    based parallel programming systems.  Linda is a set of operators
    that are added to various conventional programming languages to
    produce a parallel programming language.

Linux-Activists
    Contact: linux-activists-request@niksula.hut.fi (Ari Lemmke)

    Purpose: Linux operating system hacking.  Linux is now on a hackers
    only stage.  More information is available by FTP from nic.funet.fi:
    /pub/OS/Linux/README.

Llajta
    Contact: readingj@cerf.net  (John Reading)
   
    Purpose: Llajta exists for the discussion of any and all topics
    relating to Bolivia.  All communication regarding the list is
    sent to readingj@cerf.net and messages are redistributed manually
    as needed.

Logo
    Contact: logo-friends-request@aiai.ed.ac.uk

    Purpose: Discuss the Logo computer language.

lojban
    Contact: lojban-list-request@snark.thyrsus.com  (John Cowan)

    Purpose: To use, discuss, and contribute to the development of the
    constructed human language called Lojban (known in earlier
    versions as Loglan).  Lojban has a grammar based on predicate
    logic, and vocabulary built from the six most widely spoken human
    languages.  It is intended as a tool for experimental linguistics,
    as a medium for communication with computers, and as a possible
    international auxiliary language.

    Lojban-list is an unmoderated mail reflector.  New subscribers are
    asked to send their postal mailing addresses as well, so that they
    can be placed on the mailing list of The Logical Language Group,
    Inc., a non-profit organization.  The postal mailing list provides
    materials that are useful in learning about the language.
    Lojban-list and LLG, Inc. are in no way affiliated with The Loglan
    Institute, Inc., or with James Cooke Brown, the founder of Loglan.

lute
    Contact: lute-request@sunapee.dartmouth.edu (Wayne B. Cripps)

    Purpose: For lute players and researchers of lute music.

MachTen
    Contact: MachTen-request@tenon.com  (Leonard Cuff)

    Purpose: Discuss topics of interest to users of MachTen, a Mach/BSD
    Unix for all Macintoshes from Tenon Intersystems.  This includes 
    programming tips and examples, configuration questions, and discussion
    of problems and workarounds.  People not currently using MachTen and 
    wanting either general information or specific questions answered 
    should not subscribe, but write to info@tenon.com.

macgyver
    Contact:  shari@cc.gatech.edu (Shari Feldman)

    Purpose: To discuss current and previous MacGyver episodes.  We
    also discuss what is currently happening with the main and
    reoccuring actors on the show.

mac-security
    Contact: mac-security-request@world.std.com (David C. Kovar)

    Purpose: This mailing list is for people interested in Macintosh
    security. This can be used to:
	* Discuss existing security problems in various Macintosh applications.
	* Discuss security applications, hardware, and solutions.
	* Discuss potential problems and their solutions.
	* Just about anything else related to Macintosh security and
	  access control.

    With the arrival of System 7.0 and it's wealth of information
    sharing facilities, Macintosh security has entered a new era.
    Originally you only had to worry about someone getting into your
    Macintosh via the keyboard, or stealing it outright. Now it's much
    easier to browse through information on someone else's Macintosh
    over the network.

magic
    Contact: magic-request@crdgw1.ge.com (Bruce Barnett)

    Purpose: The MAGIC mailing list is for the discussion of sleight of hand and
    the art of magic.  Membership to the list is restricted, as
    people who are merely curious are not encouraged to join.
    You must fill out a questionaire to qualify.

manchester
   Contact: manchester-request@irss.njit.edu -or-
	    uunet!irss.njit.edu!manchester-request (Eric Ng)

   Purpose: This list is primarily a forum where people interested in
   bands representative of the "Manchester" sound can get together for
   discussion.  Examples of bands being discussed here include the Stone
   Roses, Happy Mondays, Inspiral Carpets, the Charlatans, 808 State,
   Northside, etc.  The definition of the Manchester sound is vague at
   best: use your best judgement when trying to determine if a group
   falls under the aegis of Manchester.

   Both list and weekly digest formats are available.

martial-arts
    Contact:   martial-arts-request@dragon.cso.uiuc.edu (Steven Miller)

    Purpose: The martial arts mailing list is for discussion on
    various aspects of the martial arts.  This includes teaching and
    training techniques, martial arts philosophy, self-defense,
    traditional and non-traditional styles, among others.

Masonic Digest
    Contact: ptrei@mitre.org (Peter Trei)

    Purpose: The Masonic Digest is a moderated forum for discussion of
    Free Masonry, affiliated groups, and other fraternal orders.  As
    moderator, I do not pass on ay message which contains or purports to
    contain material I am obliged to conceal, or which I believe members
    of other orders are obliged to conceal.  Within that restriction, I am
    as liberal as possible.  Postings from non-Masons are welcome.  So
    is criticism, as long as it is reasoned and in good taste.
 
MasPar
    Contact: mp-users@thunder.mcrcim.mcgill.edu  (Lee Iverson)

    Purpose: We have no restrictive charter, so are open to any and
    all discussions of hardware/software issues surrounding the use of
    the MasPar MP-1 class of parallel SIMD machines.  These machines
    have a full-featured data-parallel instruction set and are
    programmable in Fortran90 and MPL, a K&R C with parallel data
    types.

Matlab
    Contact: matlab-users-request@mcs.anl.gov (Chris Bischof)

    Purpose: Discussion group for users and potential users of the
    MATLAB numeric computation software from The MathWorks.  MATLAB is
    an interactive matrix-oriented product for linear algebra, digital
    signal processing, equation solving, control system design, and
    other engineering and scientific applications.  This mailgroup is
    administered by the independent MATLAB User Group.
	
mazda-list
    Contact: mazda-list-request@ms.uky.edu  (Joel Abbott)

    Purpose:  Technical correspondance and discussion of
    Mazda-designed vehicles.

MC68HC11 
    Contact: mc68hc11-request@elden.cse.nau.edu (Nick Sayer)

    Purpose: Discussions about the Motorola MC68HC11 family of
    microcontrollers.

medphys
    Contact: medphys-request@radonc.duke.edu

    Purpose:  An attempt to foster electronic communication between
    medical physicists, open to interested others.  Medical physics is
    a somewhat opaque but widely used synonym for radiological physics
    -- the physics of the diagnostic and therapeutic use of radiation
    in medicine.  At present most of the subscribers are involved in
    radiotherapy.

Melissa Etheridge
    Contact: Etheridge-request@krylov.cnd.mcgill.ca

    Purpose:  The purpose of this list is to discuss Melissa Etheridge
    and her music.

men
    Contact: mail-men-request@usl.com (Marcel Franck Simon)
          or att!usl!mail-men-request.

    Purpose: This digested mailing list discusses "men's issues."
    Both women and men may join. Mail-men is a place where men and
    women can discuss men's issues in an atmosphere of openness and
    support. Men's issues are those problems and experiences that
    affect male humans.

miata
    Contact: miata-request@jhunix.hcf.jhu.edu (Andy S Poling)

    Purpose: This list was formed when it became evident that there
    was a growing body of enthousiastic Mazda Miata owners.  There are
    no rules governing what you can and cannot post to the list - it
    is an open forum.

military
     Contact: military-request@att.att.com (Bill Thacker)

     Purpose: Discussion of military technology, and related issues.
     This group is gatewayed to and from the Usenet newsgroup
     sci.military; all postings to the group are echoed to the list,
     and vice-versa.  Both the group and list are moderated to
     prevent political flammage.

miniatures
    Contact: bell@cs.unc.edu or ...!mcnc!unc!bell (Andrew Bell)

    Purpose: The Miniatures Digest is a courtesy of Andrew Bell. It is
    a forum for the discussion of painting, converting, and sculpting
    of miniature figures.

mr2-interest
    Contact: mr2-interest-request@validgh.com (David Hough)

    Purpose:  Discussion of Toyota MR2's, old and new.

MST3K
    Contact: rsk@gynko.circ.upenn.edu (Rich Kulawiec)

    Purpose: MST3K is a moderated mailing list for fans of the
    television show "Mystery Science Theater 3000", which is shown on
    the Comedy Channel (available on various cable networks in North
    America).  Requests to be added/deleted and submissions for the
    list itself should be sent to the address above; please include
    "mst3k" somewhere on the "Subject:" line of each message to ensure
    that it is filed correctly.  Archives of the list are maintained,
    but are not FTP'able yet.

mtxinu-users
    Contact: dunike!mtxinu-users-request 
	     mtxinu-users-request@nike.cair.du.edu

    Purpose: Discussion and bug fixes for users of the 4.3+NFS release
    from the Mt. Xinu folks.
 
MUD
    Contact: jwisdom@gnu.ai.mit.edu (Joseph Wisdom)

    Purpose: If you are new in the MUD world, or are simply looking
    for new places to get into, try subscribing to Internet Games
    MUD-List today! Make sure to include the string "mud list" in the
    subject header.

Music-Research
    Contact: Music-Research-Request@prg.oxford.ac.uk (Stephen Page)

    Purpose: The Music-Research electronic mail redistribution list
    was established after a suggestion made a meeting on Oxford in
    July 1986, to provide an effective and fast means of bringing
    together musicologists, music analysts, computer scientists, and
    others working on applications of computers in music research.

    As with any forum for discussion, there are certain subject areas
    which are of particular interest to the group of people on this
    list.  Initially, the list was established for people whose chief
    interests concern computers and their applications to music
    representation systems, information retrieval systems for mucial
    scores, music printing, music analysis, musicology and 
    ethnomusicology and tertiary music education.  The following
    areas are not the principal conern of this list, although
    overlapping subjects may wewll be interesting: primary and
    secondary education, sound generation techniques and composition.
    Articles on electronic music, synthesizers, MIDI, etc, will be
    rejected at the request of the readers of the list.

musicals
    Contact: musicals-request@world.std.com    (Elizabeth Lear Newman)

    Purpose: This forum is intended for the general discussion of
    musical theater, in whatever form it make take, but related
    non-musical theater topics are welcome too.  90% of the traffic is
    the musicals-related flow from the newsgroup rec.arts.theatre.

mustangs
    Contact mustangs-request@cup.hp.com   (Gary Gitzen)
		or hplabs!hpda!mustangs-request

    Purpose: To discuss/share technical issues, problems, solutions,
    and modifications relating to late model (~1980+) Ford Mustangs.
    Some issues may also be relevant to other Fords.  Flames and "my
    car is faster than your car" mailings are discouraged.

mystery
    Contact: mystery-request@csd4.csd.uwm.edu (Thomas Krueger)

    Purpose: Mystery is a mailing list for mystery and detective
    fiction. Reviews of works and discussions of plot,
    characterization, and other aspects will be discussed. The medium,
    whether novel, movie, or television series, is unimportant.

NA-net
    Contact: na.join@na-net.ornl.gov

    Purpose: Numerical analysis discussions.  To join the NA-NET send
    mail and in the message body specify the following three fields in
    any order:
       Lastname:
       Firstname:
       E-mail: 

NativeNet
    Contact: gst@gnosys.svle.ma.us (Gary S. Trujillo)

    Purpose: To provide information about and to discuss issues
    relating to indigenous people around the world, and current
    threats to their cultures and habitats (e.g. rainforests).

navnews
    Contact: navnews@nctamslant.navy.mil
 
    Purpose: E-mail distribution list for the weekly Navy News
    Service (NAVNEWS), published by the Navy Internal Relations
    Activity in Washington.  NAVNEWS contains official news and
    information about fleet operations and exercises, personnel
    policies, budget actions, and more.  This is the same news
    service which is distributed through Navy circuits to ships at
    sea and to shore commands around the world.  Subscriptions to
    NAVNEWS by e-mail are available at no charge to anyone with a
    mailbox on any network reachable through the Internet.

Ncube
    Contact: ncube-users-request@cs.tufts.edu (David Krumme)

    Purpose: Exchange of information among people using NCUBE parallel
    computers.

netblazer-users
    Contact: netblazer-users-request@telebit.com

    Purpose: To provide an unmoderated forum for discussions among
    users of Telebit NetBlazer products.  Topics include known
    problems and workarounds, features discussions, and configuration
    advice.

Network-Audio-Bits
    Contact: Murph@Maine.BITNET   (Michael A. Murphy)

    Purpose: Network Audio Bits & Audio Software Review is a
    bi-monthly electronic magazine that features reviews of and
    information about current rock, pop, new age, jazz, funk, folk and
    other musical genres.  A mixture of major label artists and
    independent recording artists can be found reviewed in these
    'pages'.

neuron
    Contact: neuron-request@cattell.psych.upenn.edu (Peter Marvit)

    Purpose: Neuron-Digest is a moderated list (in digest form)
    dealing with all aspects of neural networks (and any type of
    network or neuromorphic system).  Topics include both
    connectionist models (artificial neural networks) and biological
    systems ("wetware").  Back issues and limited software is
    available via FTP from cattell.psych.upenn.edu. The Digest is
    gatewayed to USENET's comp.ai.neural-nets.

newlists
    Contact: info@vm1.nodak.edu   (Marty Hoag)

    Purpose:  This is a mailing list "clearing house" for new mailing
    lists.  Subscribers will get announcements of new lists that are
    mailed to this list.

NewsCom
    Contact: starkid@ddsw1.mcs.com  (Lance Sanders)

    Purpose: To make available synergies discerned in, and created
    from, print news media (up to a 12-year time-span).  Many "facts,"
    particulary scientific ones, have a habit of changing with time.
    NewsCommando shows extreme prejudice toward those articles whose
    contents exhibit "legs." The depth of insight possible using the
    information mosaic method can be staggering. A form of electronic
    magazine, NewsCommando can serve as a reference tool, offer unique
    jump-off points for Medline, PaperChase, or other searches, and,
    in many ways, is the "poor-man's IdeaFisher/IdeaBank."  Vol. 1
    will contain the following articles:
       ChemTao: Synergies In the Life Sciences
       EarthWatch1: Defining the Scope of Environmental Destruction
       Why Euthanasia Must Never Be Legalized
    Use "NewsCom request" in the "Subject:" field of message headers.
    Indicate article title(s) desired or "all" in body of message.
    Articles will be deposited in your mailbox with a "NewsCom/Vol.#"
    Subject header.  Most will be in excess of 20K.  Please group-save
    them to a file for later reading.

nordic-skiing
    Contact: nordic-ski-request@graphics.cornell.edu (Mitch Collinsworth)

    Purpose: Discussion of nordic skiing sports.  This includes
    cross-country, biathlon, ski-orienteering, ski jumping, nordic
    combined, telemark and back-country.

nqthm-users
    Contact: nqthm-users-request@cli.com
          or nqthm-users-request@inf.fu-berlin.de

    Purpose: Discussion of theorem proving using the Boyler-Moore 
    theorem prover, NQTHM.  Offers lore, advice, information, discussion,
    help and a few flames.

ntp
    Contact: ntp-request@trantor.umd.edu

    Purpose:  Discussion of the Network Time Protocol.

nucmed
    Contact: nucmed-request@uwovax.uwo.ca  -or-
             trevorc@uwovax.uwo.ca  (Trevor Cradduck)

    Purpose: A discussion of Nuclear Medicine and related issues.  Of
    particular concern is the format of digital images.

numeric-interest
    Contact: numeric-interest-request@validgh.com (David Hough)

    Purpose: Discussion of issues of floating-point correctness and
    performance with respect to hardware, operating systems,
    languages, and standard libraries.

nwu-sports
    Contact: nwu-sports-request@tssi.com (Michael Nolan)

    Purpose: Information about and discussion of Northwestern University
    sports, also known as "da cats."

From arielle@taronga.com Mon Jul 27 13:49:06 1992
From: arielle@taronga.com (Stephanie da Silva)
Newsgroups: news.lists,news.announce.newusers,news.answers
Subject: Publicly Accessible Mailing Lists, Part III
Date: 18 Jul 92 18:20:36 GMT
Followup-To: poster
Organization: Taronga Park BBS
Supersedes: <RKLG18L@taronga.com>

Archive-name: mailing-lists/part3


[This is the third of three articles on mailing lists.]

objc
    Contact: bunker!stpstn!objc-request (Anthony A. Datri)

    Purpose: The Objective-C mailing list is for the discussion of
    Stepstone's Objective-C language, Objective-C compiler, Objective-C
    interpreter, and the ICPak-201 user interface library.

objectivism
    Contact:  objectivism-request@vixie.sf.ca.us  (Paul Vixie)

    Purpose:  A mailing list where students of Objectivism can discuss
    their ideas, concrete issues, exchange news, etc.  Any issue that
    may have some relevance to Objectivists is appropriate here.


objectivism-philosophy
    Contact: objectivism-request@twwells.com (T. William Wells)

    Purpose: A mailing list for discussion of the philosophy of
    Objectivism. This is not a general Objectivism mailing list;
    discussions are restricted to the philosophy itself.

ODA 
    Contact:	utzoo!trigraph!oda-request	(Les Gondor)

    Purpose: ODA is a mailing list for topics related to the ISO 8613
    standard for Office Document Architecture, and ODIF (Office
    Document Interchange Format).

offroad
    Contact: uunet!samsung!wizvax!offroad-request  (Stephanie P. Gilgut)

    Purpose: To discuss/share experiences about 4X4 offroad
    adventures, tips and anything else related to 4 wheel drive, off
    roading, etc.  This list is reflector driven.

Oglasna Deska
    Contact: Oglasna-Deska@IJS.AC.Mail.YU (Jure Marn)
          or Oglasna.Deska@Uni-LJ.AC.Mail.YU

    Purpose: "Oglasna Deska" (bulletin board) is transcripts taken from
    SLON, which is a nickname for Decnet connecting several computers in
    Yugoslavia.  There is a conference similar to Usenet running under
    SLON and the articles and replies are occasionally saved and sent to
    the world.  The topics cover wide area, the language used is Slovene,
    Croatian or Serbian, and some articles are in English.  At the moment
    there is no interaction possible so the participation is reduced to
    reading.  The topics covered are equivalent to Usenet groups talk.
    politics.misc (from Ljubljana and Belgrade), rec.cars, rec.humor,
    comp.networks.*, and rec.climbing.  Misc.invest is in the offing.

oh-motss
    Contact oh-motss-request@cps.udayton.edu

    Purpose: The oh-motss (Ohio Members Of The Same Sex) mailing list
    is for open discussion of lesbian, gay, and bisexual issues in and
    affecting Ohio.  The mailing list is not moderated, and is open to
    all, regardless of location or sexuality.  Further, participation
    on the list does not necessarily indicate a person's sexual
    preference or orientation.  The subscriber list is known only to
    the list owner.

on-this-day
    Contact: geiser@pictel.com (Wayne Geiser)

    Purpose: Subscribers to on-this-day receive a daily listing of
    interesting birthdays, events, religious holidays, astronomical
    events, etc.  The messages are sent out in the wee hours of the
    morning, so you should have it for your morning coffee.  :-)

on-u
    Contact: on-u-request@pta.pyramid.com.au (Ben Golding)

    Purpose: The On-U Sound mailing list encourages discussions
    related to the Adrian Sherwood's On-U Sound label and the artists
    that record on it.  This includes Tack>>Head, Gary Clail, The Dub
    Syndicate, African Head Charge, Bim Sherman, Mark Stewart, etc.

operlist
    Contact: operlist-request@cs.bu.edu (Helen Trillian Rose)

    Purpose: a discussion list for *everything* having to do with irc.
    Its main purpose is irc routing discussions, protocol discussions,
    and announcements of new versions (of irc clients and servers).

oracle
    Contact: oracle-people@iuvax.cs.indiana.edu (Steve Kinzler,
						 Ray Moody)

    Purpose:  A cooperative effort for creative humor.  The Usenet
    Oracle answers any questions posed to it.  Send mail to
    oracle@iuvax.cs.indiana.edu (or {ames,rutgers}!iuvax!oracle)
    with the word "help" in the subject line for complete details
    on how to participate.

    A distribution list is available for receiving compilations of
    the best Oracle answers (the Usenet Oracularities, also posted
    to rec.humor).  Send mail to oracle-request@iuvax.cs.indiana.edu.

orienteering
    Contact: orienteering-request@graphics.cornell.edu (Mitch Collinsworth)

    Purpose:  Discuss all aspects of the sport of orienteering.

origami
    Contact: origami-request@cs.utexas.edu  (Brad Blumenthal)

    Purpose: This unmoderated mailing list is for discussion of all
    facets of origami, the Japanese art of paper folding.  Topics
    include bibliographies, folding techniques, display ideas,
    descriptions of new folds, creativity, materials, organizations,
    computer representations of folds, etc.

pagan
    Contact: pagan-request@drycas.club.cc.cmu.edu (Stacey Greenstein)

    Purpose: To discuss the religions, philosophy, etc. of paganism.

Papa
    Contact: dgross@polyslo.calpoly.edu (Dave Gross)

    Purpose:  To discuss the life and works of Ernest Hemingway.

pc532
    Contact: pc532-request@bungi.com  (Dave Rand)

    Purpose: a mailing list for people interested in the pc532
    project. This is a National Semiconductor NS32532 based system,
    offered for a very low cost.

pcgeos-list
    Contact: pcgeos-list-request@csd.mot.com (Brian Smithson)

    Purpose: Discussion forum for users or potential users of PC/GEOS
    products, including GeoWorks Ensemble, GeoWorks Pro, GeoWorks POS,
    and third party products.  Topics include general information, tips,
    techniques, applications, experiences, etc.  The pcgeos-list is
    also gatewayed to the Usenet newgroup comp.os.msdos.pcgeos.

pdp8-lovers
    Contact: pdp8-lovers-request@mc.lcs.mit.edu  (Robert E. Seastrom)

    Purpose: This mailing list exists in order to facilitate
    communication and cooperation between owners of vintage DEC
    computers, specifically, but not limited to, the PDP-8 series of
    minicomputers.  Discussions of all manner of hardware, software,
    programming techniques are invited.  Ownership of an 'antique'
    computer is not required for membership, but flames from people
    who feel that anything that is not cutting edge technology is
    worthless are discouraged.

People of the South Wind
    Contact: kansas-request@aladdin.b11.ingr.com (Ryan Waldron)

    Purpose: This is a Kansas mailing list which discusses songs, 
    concerts, etc. of the rock group Kansas.  This mailing list is
    simply an echo site, so all posts get bounced from that address 
    to all the people subscribed.

Peru
    Contact: owner-peru@athena.mit.edu (Ivan Cavero Belaunde)

    Purpose:  For discussion of Peruvian culture and other issues.

pharm
    Contact: pharm-request@udel.edu

    Purpose: a mailing list digest version of "alt.drugs" restricted
    to postings without repetitive political arguments or flames.
    Political articles of particularly novel value and reports of
    policy developments will be included.

    Under no circumstances will any message be passed along that may
    be construed to be a solicitation to engage in any form of illegal
    behavior.

physics
    Contact: physics-request@qedqcd.rye.ny.us (Mike Miskulin)

    Purpose: Physics is a newly created digest to cover current
    developments in theoretical and experimental physics.  Typical
    topics might include particle physics, plasmaphysics,
    astrophysics.  Discussions related to all branches (large and
    small) of physics are welcome.

picasso-users
    Contact: picasso-users@postgres.berkeley.edu

    Purpose:  For users of the Picasso graphical User Interface
    Development System.

pipes
    Contact: pipes-request@paul.rutgers.edu  (Steve Masticola)

    Purpose: For all those who enjoy smoking, collecting, or sharing
    information on pipes, tobacco, and related topics. Flames aren't
    allowed (except for the purpose of lighting up :-)

Pisma Bralcev
    Contact: Pisma-Bralcev@IJS.Mail.YU (Andrej Brodnik)
          or Pisma.Bralcev@IJS.AC.Mail.YU

    Purpose: "Pisma bralcev" is an edited (not moderated) mailing list 
    which provides the possibility of publishing readers' opinions,
    questions, inquiries for help, answers, etc.  There are also 
    published travel tips and book reviews.  Anybody can send the letter
    to the editor and it will be published on the list under his name.
    The author can request anonymity and it will be respected entirely.  
    The frequency of publishing is about one issue per day or less.  The 
    language is originally Slovene, but other languages appear as well.

POP
    Contact: pop-request@jhunix.hcf.jhu.edu (Andy S Poling)

    Purpose: This list was formed, out of desperation for an organized
    source of information, to discuss the Post Office Protocol (POP2
    and POP3 - described in RFCs 918, 937, 1081, and 1082) and
    implimentations thereof.

    The driving interest was lack of easily obtained knowledge of
    available POP2 and POP3 servers and clients.  This mailing list is
    meant to provide this information.  Anyone, whether consumer or
    product provider is invited to participate.

porschephiles
    Contact: porschephiles-request@bcm.tmc.edu  (Stan Hanks)

    Purpose: Discussion of Porsches.

posix-ada
    Contact:  umd5!grebyn!posix-ada-request	-or-
	      posix-ada-request@grebyn.com	(Karl Nyberg)
    
    Purpose: to discuss the Ada binding of the Posix
    standard.  This is the IEEE P1003.5 working group.

posix-testing
    Contact: posix-testing-request@mindcraft.com (Chuck Karish)

    Purpose: This list will provide a forum for discussion of issues
    related to testing operating systems for conformance to the
    various POSIX standards and proposed standards (IEEE 1003.x and
    whatever derivative standards may emerge from the NIST, ANSI, ISO,
    and so on).

    These issues include problems related to test suites in general,
    testability of various features of the standards, and portability
    of the test suites to the many very different POSIX
    implementations we expect to see in the near future.  We'll focus
    on the test suites themselves, rather than on the standards to
    which they test (notably POSIX p1003.3).

prion
    Contact: prion-request@stolaf.edu  (Chris Swanson)

    Purpose: While the main goal of the digest is to provide a
    resource for researchers working with prions and interested
    bystanders, all are welcome.  All articles posted will be included
    in the next digest.  If a poster feels that his posting is of an
    urgent nature, it may be distributed sooner than the regular
    digest. 

PRL
    Contact: brewer@ace.enet.dec.com  (John Brewer)

    Purpose: The Pirate Radio SWL list is for the distribution of
    questions, answers, information and loggings of Pirate Radio
    Stations. This includes SW stations, MW (AM broadcast) and FM
    pirates.

Prog-Pubs
    Contact: prog-pubs-request@fuggles.acc.virginia.edu

    Purpose: PROG-PUBS is a mailing list for people interested in
    progressive and/or alternative publications and other media.

    PROG-PUBS was originally created to facilitate and encourage
    communication among people interested in and active with the
    "alternative student press" movement.  However, the list's scope
    is now broader than this; we welcome and encourage participation
    from people involved in all kinds of small-scale, independent,
    progressive and/or alternative media, including newspapers,
    newsletters, and radio and video shows, whether campus-based or
    not.

Progress
    Contact: Progress-list-request@math.niu.edu 

    Purpose: Discussion of the Progress RDBMS.

pubnet
    Contact: pubnet-request@chinacat.unicom.com (Chip Rosenthal)

    Purpose: The administration and use of public access computer
    systems - primarily UNIX systems.  The list membership includes a
    large number of people who run sites listed in the world-famous
    NIXPUB listing.  If you have questions about setting up or running
    a public access system, this is the place to be.

qn
    Contact: qn-request@queernet.org (Roger Klorese)

    Purpose: a mailing list for Queer Nation activists and for all
    interested in Queer Nation, an activist group devoted to
    furthering gay rights.  The purpose of qn is to network among
    various Queer Nation chapters, discussion actions and tactics, and
    for general discussion of how to bring about Queer Liberation.

Quanta
    Contact:  da1n@andrew.cmu.edu

    Purpose: Quanta is an electronically distributed magazine of
    science fiction.  Published monthly, each issue contains short
    fiction, articles and editorials by authors around the world and
    across the net.  Quanta publishes in two formats: straight ascii
    and PostScript* for PostScript compatible printers.  To subscribe
    to Quanta, or just to get more info, send mail.

quattro
    Contact: quattro-request@aries.east.sun.com (David Tahajian)
    
    Purpose: To disuss Audi cars, and especially the AWD quattro
    models.  All Audi-related discussion is welcome, including news,
    opinions, maintenance procdures and parts sources.

Queen
    Contact: com@spacsun.rice.edu (Christopher Owen Miller)
    please include the word SUBSCRIBE as your subject

    Purpose: Discussion about the rock group Queen.

race
    Contact: race-request@formula1.corp.sun.com

    Purpose: To discuss motocycle racing (primarily on asphalt
    tracks) and associated technologies.  This is a fairly broad
    interest group, with experience spanning motojournalism,
    roadracing from the perspective of the pit crew and racers,
    and engineering.  It is also possible to receive the list
    in digest form.

recipes
    Contact: recipes-request@mthvax.cs.miami.edu (a.e.mossberg)

    Purpose: Digest version of rec.food.recipes, a USENET newsgroup
    for sharing tasteful recipes.

recovery
    Contact: recovery@wvnvm.wvnet.edu (Jeff Brooks)

    Purpose: recovery is intended as a forum and support group for
    survivors of childhood sexual abuse/incest and/or their SO's.
    Postings are published in digest format and contributors may post
    anonymously. The emphasis is on healing and recovery through the
    use of the Twelve Steps of Alcoholics Anonymous as adapted for our
    purpose.

REM
    Contact: valerie@athena.mit.edu  (Valerie Ohm)

    Purpose:  Discussion of the music and lyrics by the music group
    R.E.M.

RokPress
    Contact: TKosir@ACS.UCalgary.CA (Tomaz Kosir)
          or RokPress@IJS.AC.Mail.YU
          or RokPress@Uni-LJJ.AC.Mail.YU

    Purpose: RokPress is a moderated mailing list, intended primarily for 
    news from Slovenia.  Slovene is the principal language, although 
    articles from Croatian and Serbian source are often included.  It 
    includes also news from international press and important announcements 
    related to Slovenia and Slovenes.  The volume is kept as low as possible.

RoleMaster
    Contact: rmappl@delfax.amiga.ocunix.on.ca (Rick Morrow)

    Purpose: The RoleMaster mailing list is for the discussion and
    development of the RoleMaster, SpaceMaster and MERPS games from
    Iron Crown Enterprises.

rune-quest
    Contact: bell@cs.unc.edu -or- ...!mcnc!unc!bell (Andrew Bell)

    Purpose: The RuneQuest Digest is a courtesy of Andrew Bell. It is
    a collection of articles, discussion, and source material for use
    with Chaosium's Runequest fantasy role-playing game.

rush
    Contact: rush-request@syrinx.umd.edu

    Purpose:  fans of the Canadian rock group Rush discuss things
    about the group and its music.

S-news
    Contact: S-news-request@stat.wisc.edu   (Douglas Bates)

    Purpose:  Information and discussion about the S language for data
    analysis and graphics.

sappho
    Contact: sappho-request@mc.lcs.mit.edu  (regis m. donovan)

    Purpose: A forum and support group for gay and bisexual women.
    The list is not moderated, but may become so if the volume and/or
    content begins to warrant it.  A digest version is available; if
    you want it, be sure to mention it in your addition request.  Men
    who want to "listen in," for whatever reason, are requested to use
    the feminist and alternates mailing lists instead; sappho
    membership is limited to women.

sca
    Contact: sca-request@mc.lcs.mit.edu (Danulf Donaldson, MKA Dana Groff)

    Purpose: This group discusses anything relating to the Society for
    Creative Anachronism, a world-wide medievallist organization.
    Anyone in the Society (or interested in it) is welcome to join.
    Those with basic questions about the Society should direct them to
    justin@inmet.com (Justin du Coeur, MKA Mark Waks), who will
    be happy to answer them. (Please note that the mailing list is not
    officially related to the SCA in any way; it is simply a group of
    talkative members).

    The SCA mailing list is gatewayed into the rec.org.sca newsgroup.

scoann
    Contact:  scoann-request@xenitec.on.ca  (Ed Hew)

    Purpose: The SCO Announce mailing list is a moderated announcements
    list providing product update and new product announcements supplied
    by SCO or by developers offering SCO based products.

    Submissions for the list should be addressed to scoannmod@xenitec.on.ca

    The "scoann" mlist is bi-directionally gatewayed with the USENET
    biz.sco.annouce newsgroup.

scogen
    Contact:  scogen-request@xenitec.on.ca  (Geoff Scully)

    Purpose: This group will be beneficial to any one interested or
    currently using Santa Cruz Operation products.  This mailing list
    is a single area where discussions and information can be exchanged
    regarding ALL SCO products. 

    The "scogen" mlist is bi-directionally gatewayed with the USENET
    biz.sco.general newsgroup.

scoodt
    Contact:  scoodt-request@xenitec.on.ca  (Ed Hew)

    Purpose: The SCO Open Desktop electronic mailing list is intended
    to provide a communications vehicle for interested parties to
    provide, request, submit, and exchange information regarding the
    configuration, implementation, and use of the SCO Open Desktop
    operating system as available from The Santa Cruz Operation.

    All submissions will be posted as received with appropriate author
    attribution.  Questions are welcome.  Someone may even answer them.

    The "scoodt" mlist is bi-directionally gatewayed with the USENET
    biz.sco.opendesktop newsgroup.

scribe
    Contact: scribe-hacks-request@decwrl.dec.com 

    Purpose: This list is designed for persons who perform the role of
    Scribe Database Administrator at their installation.  Discussion
    will be about Scribe features, bugs, enhancements, performance,
    support, and other topics of interest to Scribe DBAs.  The list
    will NOT be moderated, but will simply consist of a mail
    "reflector" - ie. if you send a message to the list, it will be
    rebroadcast to everyone on the list.  Discussion at the level of
    "How do I get a paragraph to indent 5 spaces instead of 3?" is
    specifically discouraged.

SDAnet
    Contact: st0o+SDA@andrew.cmu.edu (Steve Timm)

    Purpose: SDAnet is a list for and about Seventh-day Adventists.
    It is a moderated list.  Anyone may post or subscribe.

Secular Humanist Group
    Contact: secular-humanist-request@sugar.neosoft.com (Jim Thompson)
    
    Purpose: to provide a moderated forum for the discussion of secular
    lifestyles and philosophies among atheists, agnostics, and secular
    humanists.  Theists may join the list; however, proselytizing and
    debates over God and religion will be referred to more appropriate
    forums.

security
    Contact: uunet!zardoz!security-request (Neil Gorsuch)
             or security-request@cpd.com

    Purpose: to notify of unix security flaws BEFORE they become public
    knowledge, and to provide unix security enhancement programs and
    information.  Most postings are explanations of specific unix security
    "holes", including fixes or work-arounds to prevent their usage.  This
    list is not intended for discussions of general and/or theoretical
    security issues.  It is joined at the pleasure of the applicant's
    system administrator and the list administrator.

    Requests to join must be mailed from a system administration account
    and must specify (1) the full name of the recipient; (2) the address
    to send the list to; (3) the address of the contact person for that
    site (if different from (2)); (4) whether you want moderated digests
    or "reflected" postings.

SFER-l		(South Florida Environmental Reader)
    Contact: sfer-request@mthvax.cs.miami.edu  (a.e. mossberg)

    Purpose: A monthly digest of environmental articles of interest to
    South Florida residents. The newsletter is available in both paper
    and electronic formats.  

SFRaves
    Contact: sfraves-request@soda.berkeley.edu (Brian Behlendorf)

    Purpose: SFRaves is about the "rave" club scene in San Francisco.
    Even though it's locally focused, people from all over the world
    are on SFRaves.  It is an unmoderated list.

SkillsBank
    Contact: sun!kass!richard  (Richard Karasik)

    Purpose:I'd like to get people together on a mailing list who are
    willing to share their skills with others - not just the computist
    ones, althogh that's handy to know, but some of the oddball ones
    that we all seem to have aquired.

    Ground rules: the list is not going to be publicly available but
    requests to the list for specific skills will be passed on to the
    people that have them, and they can decide about the level of
    participation they want to have.  The only public piece that will
    be mailed around is the new skills that have been added, and the
    new requests for assistance.

    I am open to any other suggestions for how to make this work.

smail3-users
    Contact: smail3-users-request@cs.athabascau.ca  (Lyndon Nerenberg)

    Purpose: 	The smail3-users mailing list is targeted towards
    those who administer smail3.X based mailers.  Discussion of
    operational problems and fixes, specialized configurations, and
    other topics related to the day-to-day operation of smail3.X are
    found here.  The list does not discuss smail 2.5 issues.  (Smail
    2.5 is an unrelated piece of software that appeared in the
    comp.sources.unix archives under the archive name "smail3.")
    Questions about smail 2.5 should be directed to the newsgroup
    comp.mail.misc.  Smail3-users deals primarily with operational
    issues. If you're interested in technical discussions on smail3
    internals, consider joining smail3-wizards.

smail3-wizards
    Contact: smail3-wizards-request@cs.athabascau.ca (Lyndon Nerenberg)

    Purpose:	Smail3-wizards is a discussion forum for people who
    are actively porting, debugging, and extending smail3.X.
    Discussion should be limited to topics concerning smail3
    internals.  Questions about smail3 installation and operation
    should be directed to the smail3-users list.

smiths-fans
    Contact: larryn@csufres.csufresno.edu

    Purpose: We are a mailing list dedicated to the music of the rock
    group, The Smiths.  Though the group is no longer together, we
    feel there is a substantial enough body of work to keep a list
    such as this going.  Topics include discussion/interpretation of
    lyrics, work being done currently by members, and other
    intellectual concerns.

sonify
    Contact: sonify-request@doppler.ncsc.org (Tom Palmer)

    Purpose: To discuss all aspects of "sonification".  Sonification
    is the mapping of data values to audio, used typically as an
    adjunct to traditional scientific visualization.

sports-cards
    Contact:  cards-request@tanstaafl.uchicago.edu (Keane Arase)

    Purpose: For people interested in collection, speculation and
    investing in baseball, football, basketball, hockey and other
    trading cards and/or memoribilia.  Discussion and want/sell lists
    are welcome.  Open to anyone.

SQL-sybase
    Contact: sybase-request@apple.com

    Purpose: This is an semi-unmoderated mailing list for sharing
    information about the Sybase SQL server and related products.

stagecraft
    Contact: stagecraft-request@jaguar.cs.utah.edu  (Brad Davis)

    Purpose: This list is for the discussion of all aspects of stage
    work, including (but not limited to) special effects, sound
    effects, sound reinforcement, stage management, set design and
    building, lighting design, company management, hall management,
    hall design, and show production.  This is not a forum for the
    discussion of various stage productions (unless the discussion
    pertains to the stagecraft of a production), acting or directing
    methods (unless you know of ways to get actors to stand in the
    right spots), film or video production (unless the techniques can
    be used on the stage).  The list will not be moderated unless
    problems crop up.  Archives will be kept of the discussion (send
    mail to stagecraft-request for copies).

stardent-users
    Contact: stardent-users@antares.mcs.anl.gov

     Purpose: The stardent-users mailing list provides a forum for
    discussion of using/programming computers manufactured by Stardent
    Computer. The discussion is intended to cover programming topics
    (e.g. XFDI, phigs+, Dore, parallel and/or vectorizaton techniques,
    etc.), using one of their computers as an application engine for a
    Stardent software package or a third party package (e.g. AVS,
    Quanta, NMR1/2, etc.), or any other threads deamed applicable
    (e.g. customer service, fallout of merger, etc). The list will not
    be moderated, and it is hoped that it will generate enough
    interest to justify a news group.

Star Fleet Battles
    Contact: hcobb@fly2.berkeley.edu (Henry J. Cobb)

    Purpose: The SFB Tacticsline exists for discussion of tactics of
    the SFB game, and as a contact point for SFB PBeM games.

stormbringer
    Contact: stormbringer-request@ocf.Berkeley.EDU

    Purpose: The Stormbringer mailing list exists for both the fans of
    Michael Moorcock's books and those who enjoy Chaosium's games,
    STORMBRINGER and HAWKMOON.

stormcock
    Contact: stormcock-request@dcs.qmw.ac.uk (Paul Davison)

    Purpose: For general discussion and news concerning the music of
    Roy Harper, a folk-rock musician with a conscience.
    Recommendations and news concerning similar artists are
    encouraged. The list is set up as a mail reflector.

    NB: Some internet sites may have to route mail through the UK
    internet gateway, "nsfnet-relay.ac.uk". Also, in some exceptional
    circumstances we may have to refuse membership because we get
    charged for mail to certain addresses in the uucp domain.

sun-386i
    Contact: sun-386i-request@compaq.com

    Purpose:  Discussion and information about the 386i-based Sun
    machines.

sun-managers
    Contact: sun-managers-request@eecs.nwu.edu

    Purpose:  Information of special interest to managers of sites
    with Sun workstations or servers.

sun-nets
    Contact:  sun-nets-request@umiacs.umd.edu

    Purpose:  Discussion and information on networks using Sun
    hardware and/or software.

supercomputers
    Contact: supercomputer-request@nyu.edu  -or-  cmcl2!supercomputer-request
    Submissions: supercomputer@nyu.edu, cmcl2!supercomputer

    Purpose: To discuss "supercomputers" and related technology.
    Contact the list administrators for more information.

svr4-admin
    Contact: dynasys!svr4-admin  (Jesse W. Asher)

    Purpose:  This is for discussion of topics related to Unix System
    V Release 4.

sysops
    Contact: {harpo,bellcore,cmcl2}!cucard!dasys1!sysops-request
			-or-
	     {allegra,cmcl2,philabs}!phri!dasys1!sysops-request

    Purpose: The purpose of this list is to facilitate communication
    among operators of computerized bulletin-board systems.  Topics
    will include, but are certainly not limited to: applications,
    security, legal issues, and software.  

t3
    Contact:	t3-request@ncsugn.ncsu.edu (Ted H. Emigh)

    Purpose:  Discussion of T3, a WYSIWYG (almost) scientific word
    processing system for MS-DOS computers.

tadream
    Contact: tadream-request@vacs.uwp.edu (Dave Datta)

    Purpose: Tadream is a forum for discussions about Tangerine Dream
    and related artists. The discussions are not moderated, but
    discussions should have some small relation to Tangerine Dream
    (solo works and instrumentation discussions are welcome). The list
    is set up both as a mail relay and a daily digest. (alternate
    mail-paths: ....uwm!uwpvacs!tadream-request,
    uwpvacs!tadream-request@uwm.edu)

Talon-Eclipse-Laser
    Contact: diginst!toss@radius.com (Todd Day)

    Purpose:  For owners and admirers of Talon, Eclipse or Laser
    automobiles. 

tandy4k
    Contact: ...!{psu-cs,reed,ogcvax}!qiclab!tandy4k-users (Steven Neighorn)

    Purpose: A mailing list for owners, users, and other interested
    parties of the Intel 80386-based Tandy 4000 Microcomputer. The list
    will contain problems encountered, hints, program source code, and
    anything else related to the operation of Tandy's newest entry into
    the world of microcomputers.

tartan-c
    Contact: astrovax!tartan-c-requests

    Purpose: Discussion related to the Tartan C compiler for the vax.
    This can include bug reports, benchmarks, C quirks handled
    differently by tcc, experiences compiling system source with tcc,
    etc.

tcad
    Contact: tcad-request@iec.ufl.edu (Mark Law)

    Purpose: This mailing list ihas been set up to serve the needs of
    users and software developers of TCAD ( technology computer aided
    design ) codes.  These codes typicaaly aid the the IC process
    designer in developing, debugging, and optimizing new and old
    processes.  The group discusses software such as PISCES, SUPREM,
    FABRICS, SAMPLE, SIMPL, and MINIMOS.

tcp-group
    Contact:  tcp-group-request@ucsd.edu

    Purpose:  Discussion about promoting TCP/IP use on Ham packet
    radio.

tekumel
    Contact: tekumel-request@ssdc.honeywell.com  (Brett Slocum)

    Purpose: This mailing list exists to discuss the world of Tekumel,
    the fantasy world invented by M.A.R. Barker in the roleplaying
    games "Empire of the Petal Throne" and "Swords and Glory", and the
    DAW novels "Man of Gold" and "Flamesong".

    Anything related to Tekumel is welcome: game modifications,
    accounts of campaigns, questions, fiction, tables, NPCs, tips for
    converting to new game systems, etc. Listeners as well as
    contributors are welcome. This list is in digest format and is
    mailed when submissions warrant it (weekly if possible).

Testing-Archive
    Contact: testing-archive-request@ernie.cs.uiuc.edu (Brian Marick)

    Purpose: The purpose of Testing-Archive is to collect and archive
    material for software testing practitioners and researchers who
    are too busy to read ongoing discussions.  Therefore, typical
    messages will be abstracts of technical reports, announcements of
    testing tools (both commercial and noncommercial), reviews of
    testing tools, and summaries of discussions from other mailing
    lists or newsgroups.  The mailing list will be archived and made
    available for anonymous FTP via
    cs.uiuc.edu:/pub/testing/archiveXX.  The list is unmoderated.
 
Testing-Research
    Contact: testing-research-request@ernie.cs.uiuc.edu (Brian Marick)

    Purpose: Testing-Research is a forum for testing researchers to
    discuss current and future research at greater length (and with
    perhaps lower "density") than in Testing-Archive.  The goal of
    Testing-Archive is to create a historical record; the goal of
    Testing-Research is to create a community.  Since testing is one
    of the most down-to-earth kinds of software engineering research,
    testing practitioners are welcomed.  Messages about practice
    should be the kind that can guide or improve research; messages
    that can improve practice should go in comp.software-eng.  This
    list is unmoderated.

theatre
    Contact: theatre-request@world.std.com (Elizabeth Lear Newman)

    Purpose: This forum is intended for the general discussion of
    theater, in whatever form it make take.  This list is primarily a
    gateway for the traffic in the newsgroup rec.arts.theatre.

thicva
    Contact: thicva-request@stjhmc.fidonet.org   -or-
             {gatech,ames,rutgers}!ncar!noao!asuvax!stjhmc!thicva-request

    Purpose: The purpose of this list is to provide for the discussion
    of Traumatic Head Injuries, Cerebrovascular Accidents, and other
    related Intracranial Malformations. It is hoped that this
    conference will provide a clearing house for information on the
    above topics, on facilities that specialize in the treatment of
    Intracranial problems, and most importantly a conference where
    victims and their families can meet to discuss problems, concerns,
    and successes. An electronic international support group.

think-c
    Contact: think-c-request@ics.uci.edu  (Mark Nagel)

    Purpose: This list exists to discuss the Think C compiler for the
    Macintosh.  Acceptable topics include discussion of compiler
    problems and solutions/workarounds, discussion of object-oriented
    programming and Macintosh programming, and the sharing of source
    code.  Associated with this list is an archive stored on
    ics.uci.edu accessible via ftp and a mail archive server
    (archive-server@ics.uci.edu).  Submissions to the archive should
    go to think-c-request.

thunderbird
    Contact: htunca@ncsa.uiuc.edu (Han Tunca)

    Purpose: The purpose of the group will be to discuss all aspects
    of the Ford Thunderbird Automobiles.  The mailing list is not
    limited to any model year.

tinymush-programmers
    Contact: tinymush-programmers-request@cygnus.com

    Purpose: Discussion devoted to the programming language integral
    to the TinyMUSH subfamily of mud servers.  (See the rec.games.mud
    FAQ for more general information about muds).

toad
    Contact: toad-request@fig.cadence.com (James Jerpseth)

    Purpose: This list is a forum to exchange concert and other 
    pertinent information about the band "Toad the Wet Sprocket."
    In order to keep the noise to signal ratio low, this list will 
    filter out FAQ and transmit only new or useful information.

toaster-list
    Contact: listserv@karazm.math.uh.edu (J. Eric Townsend)

    Purpose: For discussion regarding NewTek's Video Toaster, both
    "standalone" and "card-for-the-amiga" versions.  To subscribe,
    send email to listserv@karazm.math.uh.edu with a *BODY* of
    "subscribe toaster-list  you@yoursite.domain."

TolkLang
    Contact: tolklang-request@lfcs.ed.ac.uk (Julian Bradfield)

    Purpose: Discussions of the linguistic aspects of J.R.R. Tolkien's
    works. This covers everything from Elvish vocabulary and grammar
    to his use of Old English. The list is (lightly) moderated.

torg
    Contact:  torg-request@morticia.cnns.unt.edu (Clay Luther)

    Purpose: Torg is the mailing list dedicated to the infiniverse
    of West End Game's "Torg, the Possibility Wars" Roleplaying Game.

towers
    Contact:  bill@wrangler.wlk.com (Bill Kennedy)

    Purpose: General discussion on the subject of NCR Tower computers.
    Gatewayed with comp.sys.ncr

toyota
    Contact: toyota-request@quack.sac.ca.us

    Purpose: The charter of the list is for the discussion on almost
    any subject to owners and prospective owners of all models of
    Toyota consumer passenger vehicles and light trucks.

transputer
    Contact: transputer-request@tcgould.tn.cornell.edu 

    Purpose: The Transputer mailing list was created to enhance the
    communication among those who are interested in the Transputer and
    Transputer based systems.

    Submissions should be of non-proprietary nature and be concerned
    with, but not limited to:
    
    	o  Algorithms
    	o  Current development efforts (hardware and software)
    	o  INMOS and third party systems (Meiko, FPS, etc.)
    	o  Interfaces
    	o  Dedicated computational resources
    	o  Occam and Non-Occam language development
    
    Archives of submissions are available by anonymous ftp from the
    host tcgould.tn.cornell.edu (userid "anonymous", password is of the
    form "user@host") and through uucp on a per-request basis.

    The list is maintained as a mail reflector.  Submissions are
    therefore sent out as they are received.

traveller
    Contact: traveller-request@metolius.wr.tek.com  (James T. Perkins)

    Purpose: This mailing list exists to discuss the TRAVELLER Science
    Fiction Role Playing Game, published by Game Designers' Workshop.
    All variants of Traveller (Traveller 2300, MegaTraveller), and
    Traveller games (Snapshot, Trillion Credit Squadron, etc.) are
    included, too.  Discussion is unmoderated and open to all facets
    and levels of Traveller discussion.  Listeners as well as
    contributors are welcome.

tx-firearms
    Contact: tx-firearms-request@frontier.lonestar.org

    Purpose: The tx-firearms mailing list has been created to keep
    interested parties aware of Texas firearms laws, hunting seasons
    and regulations, pending legislation, group meetings, competition
    schedules, basically anything related to firearms in the State of
    Texas. The list is not moderated and is available to anyone.

uk-hockey
    Contact: uk-hockey-request@uk.ac.hw.cs (Steve Salvini)

    Purpose: This is an open invitation to followers of hockey in the
    UK to join a mailing list dedicated to the discussion of (ice!) 
    hockey in Britain.  At present we are mailing out news, gossip, 
    league tables, match reports and results on a fairly regular basis.
    
uk-motss
    Contact: uk-motss-request@pyra.co.uk   (Internet)
          or uk-motss-request@uk.co.pyra   (JANet)
          or uk-motss-request%pyrltd.uknet (Brain dead JANet mailers)

    Purpose: The uk-motss mailing list is for gay people in the UK, or
    those who are interested in the UK gay scene / politics. It is a
    supportive environment for those unwilling or unable to read the
    soc.motss newsgroup, and confidentiality is assured. Anonymous
    posting is available.

ultralite-list
    Contact: ultralite-list-request@csd.mot.com (Brian Smithson)

    Purpose: Discussion forum for users or potential users of the
    original NEC UltraLite PC1701 and PC1702 computers (the V30-based
    notebook computer with a 1MB or 2MB silicon hard disk, not the
    newer 286- and 386-based models).  Topics include general
    information, tips, techniques, applications, experiences, and
    sources for hardware, software, accessories, and information.

Unisys
    Contact: unisys-request@bcm.tmc.edu  (Richard H. Miller)

    Purpose: Discussion of all Unisys products and equipment.

UPS-alumni
    Contact: ups_alumni-request@stephsf.com  (Bill England)

    Purpose: The mailing list has been put together ostensibly for
    the purpose of linking graduates of The University of Puget Sound.
    This list will also help those interested keep abreast of current
    events and changes at the University.  Commercial postings are
    prohibited.

uruguay
    Contact: uruguay-request@eniac.seas.upenn.edu (Raul Polakof)

    Purpose: A mailing list for general discussions and information.
    To subscribe, please send name, e-mail, topics of interest, and
    (optionally), address and phone number.  Spanish is the dominent
    language in this group.

usml
    Contact:  usml-request@hc.dspo.gov   (Josh Siegel)

    Purpose: This mailing list is for discussions on various techniques
    for simulations of the universe as related to games and reality.

UUG-dist
    Contact: uug-dist-request@dsi.com (Syd Weinstein)

    Purpose: Discussion of Unify Corporations Database products
    including Unify, Accell/IDS, Accell/SQl and Accell/"generic
    database engine."

vampire
    Contact: vampire-request@math.ufl.edu
    Send "sub vampire" as the first line of a message to the above address.

    Purpose: There is now a mailing list dedicated to the White Wolf
    Role-Playing game, "Vampire".

    Those who may be interested in the subject, but are not familiar
    with the game itself are also invited to join.  You may yet be
    Embraced :)

vanguard
    Contact: vanguard-request@farpoint.tucson.az.us
       UUCP: ...uunet!arizona!noao!farpoint!vanguard    

    Purpose: Vanguard exists to distribute articles from the National
    Vanguard, the hard-copy magazine produced by the National Alliance.
    Typical Vanguard articles are racial in nature; those uncomfortable 
    with racialist thinking should not subscribe to this list.  From
    time to time on vanguard, previous National Vanguard articles will
    be distributed.

venezuela
    Contact:  venezuela-request@arisia.xerox.com  (Eduardo Pelegri-Llopart)

    Purpose:  Discussion of anything related to Venezuela.

vettes
    Contact: vettes-request@compaq.com

    Purpose: This list is for Corvette owners and enthusiasts to share 
    their ideas and experiences about their car.

VMEbus
    Contact: att!houxl!mlh   (Marc Harrison)

    Purpose: A user's group for the AT&T VMEbus products to provide a
    two-way USENET conduit for the open exchange of information, both
    within and outside of AT&T.  There's very little data that's
    proprietary about the products (other than the source code for UNIX
    System V/VME), so the list is open to suggestions as to items of
    interest.

    If you're interested, please send your name, e-mail path (via att
    preferred), affiliation, and use of WE 321SB (if you have one).
    Suggestions for items of interest are also encouraged.

volvo
    Contact: volvo-net-request@me.rochester.edu (Tim Takahashi)

    Purpose: Discussion of Volvo automobiles.

Vreme News Digest
    Contact: Dimitrije@BuEnga.Bu.Edu (Dimitrije Stamenovic)

    Purpose: Vreme News Digest (VND) is an English-language newsletter
    published by the Vreme News Digest Agency (VNDA) from Belgrade.

wais-discussion
    Contact: wais-discussion-request@think.com

    Purpose: WAIS stands for Wide Area Information Servers, an
    electronic publishing project lead by Thinking Machines.

    The WAIS-discussion is a digested, moderated list on Electronic
    publishing issues in general and Wide Area Information Servers in
    particular.  There are postings every week or two.

wais-talk
    Contact: wais-talk-request@think.com

    Purpose: WAIS stands for Wide Area Information Servers, an
    electronic publishing project lead by Thinking Machines.

    The WAIS-talk is an open list (interactive, not moderated) for
    implementors and developers.  This is a techie list that is not
    meant as a support list.  Please use the alt.wais newsgroup for
    support, and send bug fixes etc to bug-wais@think.com.

walkers-in-darkness
    Contact: walkers-request@world.std.com  (David Harmon)

    Purpose: Walkers-in-Darkness is intended for sufferers from 
    depression and/or bipolar disorder, and affected friends.  This
    includes both "novices" and those who have learned to cope.

wargames
    Contact: wargames-request@svcdudes.com

    Purpose: For computer war games with the emphasis on the Macintosh.

warhammer
    Contact: wfrp-request@morticia.cnns.unt.edu

    Purpose: For the discussion of Games Workshop's Warhammer
    Universe, the Old World, Warhammer Fantasy Role Play, and
    Warhammer Fantasy Battle.

    The Warhammer mailing list is running ListMan 1.0b List Manager
    software.  To subscribe, send email to the above request address
    and as the first word on the subject line or any line in the text
    of the message put the word "sub". You may also include a
    parameter with the sub command.  This parameter will be treated as
    your *real* name, not your address (which is determined from your
    mail headers).  You may also send wfrp-request other commands, not
    the least of which is "help".

weights
    Contact:  weights-request@mickey.disney.com (Michael Sullivan)

    Purpose: The discussion of all aspects of using weights in
    exercise.  Includes bodybuilding (competetive and
    non-competetive), sport-related weight training, "stay in shape"
    weight training; basically anything to do with lifting weights.

whitewater
    Contact: rsk@gynko.circ.upenn.edu (Rich Kulawiec)

    Purpose:  To discuss WhiteWater sports, experiences, and
    information.  Includes kayak and canoeing enthusiasts.  Please note
    that this mailing list is partially bidirectionally gatewayed to
    the USENET group rec.boats.paddle.  Whitewater specific postings
    are culled and sent to the mailing list, and mailing list traffic
    is sent to the newsgroup.  This mailing list is moderated and is
    probably only useful to those who do not receive rec.boats.paddle,
    or are only interested in the whitewater traffic in that group.

wildnet
    Contact: zaphod!pnwc!wildnet-request@access.usask.ca --or--
             wildnet-request@access.usask.ca  (Eric Woodsworth)

    Purpose: This list is concerned with computing and statistics in
    fisheries and wildlife biology.  Relevant topics include G.I.S.,
    ecological modelling, software, etc.

windsurfing
    Contact:    windsurfing-request@gallium.uucp
             ...uunet!philabs!crpmks!gallium!windsurfing-request
             ...uunet!hsi!stpstn!gaboon!crpmks!gallium!windsurfing-request

    Purpose: The windsurfing mailing list serves as a discussion forum
    for boardsailing enthusiasts all over the world.  While
    non-windsurfers are welcome to join, the primary purpose is to
    promote the sport of windsurfing by specializing in windsurfing
    related topics such as equipment, technique, sailing sites,
    weather, the windsurf industry, etc.  We welcome you to join and
    share your windsurfing experiences and thoughts.  The list is
    non-moderated and your articles will circulate to everyone who
    joins.

Word-Mac
    Contact: mmacword@loki.une.edu.au (Roger Debreceny)
    To subscribe, mail to listserv@loki.une.edu.au with the text
    "subscribe word-mac firstname surname" in the body of the email.
   
    Purpose: Word-Mac is a mailing list dedicated to serving users of
    the Microsoft Word package in its various versions.  It has regular
    mailings of questions and answers on the use of the package and
    also mails postings on Word that have been made to Usenet groups
    such as comp.sys.mac.apps ... an FAQ list is also under development.

wxsat
    Contact: wxsat-request@ssg.com (Richard B. Emerson)

    Purpose: This list serves two functions.  The primary function is
    the distribution of NOAA status and prediction bulletins for the
    GOES and polar weather satellites.  This data is the same data
    available via SCIENCEnet NOAA.SAT bulletin board area.  The mail
    list also acts as a reflector for subscribers' comments and
    discussion of matters related to weather satellites, ground
    stations, and associated topics.

x-ada
    Contact: x-ada-request@expo.lcs.mit.edu  

    Purpose: to discuss the interfaces and bindings for an
    Ada interface to the X window system.

XGKS
    Contact: xgks-request@unidata.ucar.edu  (Steve Emmerson)

    Purpose: A mailing-list for the maintenance, enhancement, and
    evolution of the XGKS package, created by the University of
    Illinois under contract with IBM and distributed as part of X11R4.
    The XGKS package is a full 2C GKS implementation and allows GKS
    applications to operate in an X Window System environment.

xopen-testing
    Contact: xopen-testing-request@uel.co.uk (Andrew Josey)

    Purpose: This list provides a forum for discussion of issues
    related to testing operating systems for conformance to the X/OPEN
    Portability Guide (XPG), including Issue 3 (XPG3) and later.
   
    The scope of this newsletter is the discussion of items associated
    with the testing of the X/Open Portability Guide - including but
    not limited to test suite technology (X/Open's VSX and other third
    party test suites for the XPG), latest news on X/Open Branding and
    other related issues. These issues can include problems related to
    test suites in general, testability of various features of the
    XPG, and portability of the test suites.

XVT
    Contact: tim@qed.cts.com (Tim Capps)
    Interested parties should send mail with 'HELP XVTDEV' as the body
    of the letter to: listserv@qed.cts.com.

    Purpose: XVT is a multi-platform window environment development tool.

yello
    Contact: yello-request@polyslo.calpoly.edu (Cliff Tuel)

    Purpose: The Yello Mailing List is a forum for discussing anything
    about the group Yello, or any solo works by the band's members.
    An extensive discography is available, as are several other files
    of interest.

Yes/ABWH
    Contact: v111pbxx@ubvms.cc.buffalo.edu (Cathy Leak)

    Purpose: The progressive rock group Yes and its many offspring
    (especially the current branch of Anderson, Bruford, Wakeman and
    Howe). We do a little of everything: news, reviews, trivia, etc.

Yiddish
    Contact: dave@lsuc.on.ca   -or-   lsuc!dave	(Dave Sherman)

    Purpose: articles, jokes, etc. in transliterated Yiddish, and
    discussion of Yiddish language and culture (in English).  Some
    familiarity with the language is required to understand most of
    the messages.

YSN
    Contact: ysn-adm@zoyd.ee.washington.edu (John Sahr)

    Purpose: Activism on employment issues for scientists just
    beginning their careers.  The Young Scientists' Network
    attempts to inform the press, the public, and government
    officials that there is no shortage of scientists; we hope
    to find traditional and non-tradiotional employment for
    scientists.  Stories about the Young Scientists' Network
    have appeared in Science, Physics Today, and on National
    Public Radio; we've met with officials from the National
    Science Foundation and other agencies.

Z-cars
    Contact: z-car-request@dixie.com (John De Armond)

    Purpose:The Z-car mailing list operates for the benefit of those
    interested in Datsun/Nissan Z cars.  The interest base is
    primarily for the original Z, though all discussion regarding the
    Z line of cars is welcome.

zeppelin
    Contact: zeppelin-request@ux.acs.umn.edu (Eric David Hendrickson)

    Purpose:  For fans of the rock group Led Zeppelin.

ZForum
    Contact: zforum-request@prg.oxford.ac.uk (Jonathan Bowen)

    Purpose: ZForum is intended to handle messages concerned with the
    formal specification notation Z. Z, based on set theory and first
    order predicate logic, has been developed at the Programming
    Research Group (PRG) at Oxford University for well over a decade.
    It is now used by industry as part of the software (and hardware)
    development process in both the UK and the US. It is currently
    undergoing standardization.  ZForum provides a convenient forum
    for messages and queries concerned with recent developments and
    the use of Z.

